The goods cost under 20 euros.
The fee is 40% of the value of the goods...
I am a #PRS_ORG# wholesale customer, so it's not a problem for me.
I just need a number or instruction as to which parcel I should drop off so that it can be tracked as a return for you.
I ordered the #PRS_ORG# a few days ago... for €249.
Today, it costs 179€.
I find that quite annoying.
Do I have to cancel the order and re-order for the better price or is there another way to get a refund?
I also think that children shouldn't be expected to take on a parental role for their younger siblings.
However, I think that big brothers and sisters also benefit from caring for the little ones in a reasonable way.
Just have a quick look, just help a bit, just bring the bottle etc.
This way they learn responsibility, help out at home and are integrated.
As long as they can still have enough children, I don't see a problem with that.
If your K1 is alone for a short time and it is okay for him, that is good.
You can judge for yourself whether this is suitable for your children.
It is not as if he is going to wrap K2 and keep it company for hours while he sleeps.
It is probably legally questionable.
Perhaps this is why the psychologist's statement is true.
Because if something actually did happen, like a fire, break-in, earthquake, alien invasion etc. it would actually be too much responsibility for K1 to look after K2.
Whether that is a risk you want to take is of course up to you ;)
Please help me find the title of a book!
I remember reading a crime/thriller a few years ago and I can still remember almost the entire plot, but I can't remember the title, does anyone know?
The story was about fear and how to overcome it.
At the beginning of the story, an animal keeper commits suicide by covering himself in food and going into his enclosure with his predators.
The case is taken on by a detective who, after a short investigation, tracks down his therapist, who runs a clinic where he treats anxiety patients.
The commissioner has a small niece who is also scared (of fire) and ends up with this therapist.
There are more suicides and there is another protagonist - a photographer who is anonymously commissioned to go to the scene of the suicide and document it and post the photos on the internet.
In the end, it turns out that this therapist is running an underground therapy group where a chip is implanted in the patient's brain that suppresses the fear center in the brain and the patients ultimately end up facing their fears in the most extreme way possible.
(One woman jumps out of a window, another drives herself to death on purpose)
This fear is referred to in the book as "the fight."
At the end, there is a big showdown at the hospital that was on fire.
That's the gist of the plot, I'm pretty sure the book was written by a French author/author.
If someone knows this action or even tells me the title of the book, I would be very happy.
Oh, I don't have the password for the Wlan.
I have to contact my husband first.
That can take some time.
What steps do I need to take afterwards?
Is it also possible to get the price difference refunded?
Child, 4 years old, splinter under the nail
The four-year-old has splinters under his thumbnail (outside) over the entire length of the splinter.
They tried to pull him out with a pair of pliers.
It is very difficult to grasp.
It didn't work and it hurt.
Now the child reacts hysterically when we try.
No chance anymore.
Tomorrow I go to the doctor.
All Bosch electric tools, pneumatic tools and measuring tools are carefully checked, tested and subject to the strict quality controls of the Bosch quality assurance.
Therefore, Bosch provides a guarantee for Bosch electric tools, pneumatic tools and measuring tools.
The buyer's claims for defects under the contract of sale and statutory rights are not affected by this guarantee.
We guarantee the following tools according to the following conditions:
We guarantee in accordance with the following regulations (Nos. 2 - 7) by free rectification of defects in the tool attributable to a material or manufacturing fault within the guarantee period.
The guarantee period is 24 months, and 12 months for commercial or professional use or equivalent use.
The guarantee period begins with the first purchaser.
The date on the original receipt is the determining factor.
For all commercial, blue electrical and measuring tools (excluding high-frequency tools, industrial battery screwdrivers and pneumatic tools) purchased on or after 01.09.2004, the guarantee period is extended to 36 months if the purchaser registers the tools within 4 weeks of the purchase date.
Battery packs and chargers, as well as any accessories supplied, are excluded from this guarantee extension.
Registration can only be done online at www.bosch-pt.com/warranty.
As confirmation, the registration receipt must be printed immediately, and the original purchase receipt, from which the date of purchase can be determined.
Registration is only possible if the buyer agrees to the storage of his data there.
Excluded from the guarantee are: parts that are subject to wear and tear or other natural wear and tear, as well as defects in the tool that are attributable to normal wear and tear, abnormal environmental conditions, extraneous operating conditions, overloading or lack of maintenance or care.
Defects in the tool caused by the use of non-Bosch original parts.
Tools that have been changed or added to.
Minor deviations from the desired shape, which are insignificant for the value and usability of the tool.
The remedy for the defect that we recognize as warranted is to repair or replace the defective tool, at our option, free of charge, or with a new tool (if necessary, a replacement model).
Any tools or parts replaced become our property.
When did the deadline expire?
According to the Distance Selling Act, I have a right of rescission of 1 month.
The LokSound 5 is the most important member of the LokSound family.
The combination of a digital decoder and sound module on a printed circuit board achieves dimensions of just 30mm x 15.5mm, making it possible to install it in almost any H0 or 0 gauge locomotive.
LokSound 5 decoders are available with all common interfaces and always come with a 11x15mm "sugar cube" speaker and a speaker housing set.
Like all family members, LokSound5 is a true multi-protocol decoder.
He masters the DCC data format as well as Motorola®, Selectrix® and M4.
In the DCC format, 14 to 128 steps are as natural as 2 and 4-digit addresses and up to 32 functions.
Thanks to RailComPlus®, the decoders automatically connect to a suitable digital central office.
It masters all DCC programming modes and thanks to RailCom® it is possible to read the CV values on the main track with suitable central units.
For those who can only program CVs from 0-255, there are helper registers.
Motorola® users benefit from up to 28 steps at 255 addresses.
Three additional Motorola® addresses allow the activation of 16 functions.
An in-built programming mode also makes it possible to reprogram the venerable Control Unit 6021.
The M4 protocol allows for automatic login to mfx®-compatible central systems.
The LokSound 5 decoder recognises Märklin® braking sections as well as ZIMO® HLU braking commands or the Lenz® ABC system.
Braking with DCC brake blocks or with DC voltage is also possible.
In addition, he also holds a patent for a Selectrix® brake diode.
An ABC pendulum train automatic allows for automatic switching between two stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder can be used on both analog DC and AC tracks.
After my voucher was not extended due to a complaint that I did not receive, I will cancel my order worth about
#NUMBER#€ removed from my shopping cart and ordered elsewhere, where customer service is more valued and I don't have to tap my fingers endlessly to achieve nothing!!
What am I supposed to do with this number?
Because of Omikron: Johnson wants to push ahead with booster vaccinations
New Omicron cases are being reported by politicians and scientists in the UK.
All eligible adults in England should therefore receive an offer of the vaccine by New Year.
London - British Prime Minister Boris Johnson wants to catch up with the booster vaccinations against Corona faster than previously planned in view of the rapidly increasing Omikron figures.
Every adult in England should be offered a booster dose by the end of the year, if at least three months have passed since the second jab, Johnson said in a prerecorded video message to his countrymen on Sunday evening.
So far, the deadline has been set for the end of January.
The UK government will also provide additional support to accelerate the vaccination programmes in Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.
We're facing an emergency with the Omicron variant, which is why the vaccine must be boosted as a matter of urgency, Johnson said.
The good news is that the protection level can be raised again with a third dose.
"Now let's boo," Johnson said.
On Sunday, 1,239 more Omicron cases were recorded in the UK, taking the total to 3,137.
Compared to the previous day, it was an increase of 65 percent. dpa
Will the full amount be refunded at the time of collection?
I'm in favor of everyone using pronouns
I have sent in an application.
Today, the invitation came by email.
I want to respond to the email.
Alas, the name is not "Peter," but a somewhat more complicated name.
I googled it and depending on where he/she comes from, it's either a man or a woman.
**I have no idea how to write this email.
Can someone please help me?
** I'm a foreigner and I don't want to step on anyone's toes.
Conclusion: Everyone should imagine pronouns.
I have a total of 5 books.
Four of them are going.
Only one of the things I bought today works
Apparently the chair had a hidden flaw when it was sold.
How can such a mattress defect occur after 9 months otherwise?
First on #PRS_ORG.
But this has been the case for some time now.
No more than 14 days.
That's why I've always bought the last books online and read them on the #PRS_ORG#.
I bought 6 #PRS_ORG# but wanted to buy 8.
However, there were none.
Now they are back in stock and I would like to add 2 chairs to your order and charge you for that.
[CW] The feeling when I can't help.
Content warning: I will write here about domestic violence in more detail.
I just have to write something from the heart.
I (21) often come into contact with victims (and perpetrators) of domestic violence for professional reasons.
One theme that really nags at me and sadly comes up all too often is that many victims do not seek help or think we can't help them.
I am aware that we cannot do everything and it is not perfect.
But there are things in my job that move me more than anything else when I can't do anything about it.
I see the blue dots, the blood, the desperate eyes...
But even in a conversation with the perpetrator, who is out of sight and out of hearing, I cannot reach everyone.
I don't know why, maybe it's fear, fear of revenge, fear of leaving the familiar social environment, fear of snatching the children away from it.
What I always want to make clear, sometimes even very close to tears, is that everyone should be able to live without violence.
I want women to know that they don't have to accept violence.
I often wish I could help in any way... I know I can't.
But it will never be easy.
Please, always remember that you are worth living without violence, that is so incredibly important.
"Arcane" on Netflix: What does the series have to do with "League of Legends"?
Lots of fantasy, many complicated names, a breathtaking presentation: "Arcane", the series from the "League of Legends" computer game universe, has recently started on Netflix.
Why are we looking forward to the already announced two seasons?
Basketball Bundesliga: Derby disaster for MHP Riesen Ludwigsburg at Merlins Crailsheim
At least on young Johannes Patrick, there was no one to rely on.
Nothing again: For the second time in less than three months, the giants lost in Crailsheim - and how!
Before the game, Ludwigsburg coach John Patrick said of the cup defeat at the beginning of October against the Hakro Merlins Crailsheim: "We still have some anger in our bellies."
But after the game, they didn't back down - instead, they raised their game in the face of the 61:72 (28:38) defeat in the Basketball Bundesliga.
Where more than the bare result disappointed.
In a nutshell, a statistic has been named that sums up the whole dilemma: the three-goal quote was just 13 percent, four goals (all of them by young Johannes Patrick) in 31 attempts - any questions?
The answer came from John Patrick: "We were not focused enough after the victory in Tenerife and did not implement what we had trained for".
That is, to move the ball.
His opposite number, Sebastian Gleim, reacted differently: "It was a great game to win against Ludwigsburg for the second time," said the happy coach.
"It felt like 10,000 people."
On Saturday, only 750 people were allowed into the Hohenlohe Arena, but they paid for it.
Not least because of BBL top scorer T.J. Shorts, who scored 22 points and steered his team's game.
"The best playmaker I've ever trained," Gleim praised.
While Patrick's team saw the likes of Jordan Hulls (0 points) and Jonah Radebaugh (7) fail to deliver across the board.
Only in the last quarter (22:15) did the giants prevent a total disaster and came as close as eight points after having been 39:59 behind.
In addition to Johannes Patrick, Justin Simon scored twelve points.
Fortunately, there is still plenty of time to argue.
Already on Wednesday (7 p.m.) the giants receive the Skyliners Frankfurt, then also in Ludwigsburg at most 750 spectators.
We used to have a different email address, but I changed it.
Yes, I registered a few months ago.
Unfortunately, all warranty claims were rejected.
We have checked our legal position and have therefore written to them again.
We signed up about six months ago.
Always like a boiled egg: Max Raabe turns 59
He is able to enthuse his audience with new interpretations of songs from the 1920s and 1930s.
Currently, he is on the programme "Guten Tag, liebe Glück". If he can perform, that is.
Max Raabe was actually planning to celebrate his birthday on stage in Leipzig on Sunday.
But nothing comes of it.
The planned concert has been moved to May 2022 - "at the request of the authorities" to combat the coronavirus.
Other performances he had planned for the Advent season must be postponed, as it says on the website of the singer, who turns 59 today, and his musicians (www.palast-orchester.de).
From January, the artists will then try to make up for the dates they had to postpone in 2020 due to the pandemic.
Born on 12 December 1962 in Lünen, North Rhine-Westphalia, Max Raabe has sung a lot and enjoyed singing as a youth.
In Berlin he studied opera singing, in 1986 he founded the Palace Orchestra together with his fellow students.
Since then, the baritone has established himself with his repertoire of schlager and chanson songs in the style of the Comedian Harmonists.
It has been awarded many prizes.
His live album from the "MTV Unplugged" series (2019) reached - just like his successful album "Für Frauen ist das kein Problem" (2013) - the second place in the charts.
He has managed to take it out of the niche and into the mainstream.
Always elegantly dressed, the blonde hair tightly combed back and mindful of etiquette, Max Raabe is no longer to be found in the current German-speaking music scene.
Since 2020, he has been touring with the programme "Guten Tag, liebe Glück". dpa
Hello #NAME#, is it also possible to get a small sample of the furniture wood in advance?
It is to be supplemented with existing furniture, so that we can check beforehand whether it fits in terms of colour
It still doesn't work, I can only see the cover page but I can't turn the page.
Federal Minister of Urban Development Klara Geywitz: No new apartments are created through expropriation
The new Federal Minister of Construction, Klara Geywitz (SPD), has spoken out against the expropriation of large apartment complexes, as was demanded in a referendum in Berlin.
"With an expropriation, no new apartments are created, only the ownership structure changes," said Geywitz in an interview with the "Tagesspiegel" (Sunday).
My goal is to give tenants peace of mind that their rent will remain affordable over the next few years.
By the way, a colourful mix of, for example, private landlords, co-operatives or housing associations is actually the best protection against monopolisation.
In Berlin, the coalition of SPD, Greens and Left Party will set up an expert commission on how to handle the outcome of the referendum.
However, if the situation does not improve, Geywitz will not rule out talks with the FDP in the Ampel coalition on further tightening of tenancy law.
The coalition agreement provides for a rent cap until 2029, a cap on rent increases in strained housing markets and the extension of the rent mirror.
I will speak to the justice minister to see if we can implement this as quickly as possible.
If the rental market doesn't improve, "we will talk to our coalition partners about further steps," the SPD politician stressed.
Hello, I wanted to place an order and noticed after a few days that I had forgotten the last step of payment.
Unfortunately, the product is no longer available.
Do they know when it will be back in stock?
Or if it will happen again?
#PRS_ORG# with storage (180 x #NUMBER# cm),
The voucher sounds great
Then I will sort it out myself when you place a new order
Many thanks for the quick clarification!
If the lamp is sent in March, how long will the delivery take?
I've already cut myself on my finger
That's an absolute disgrace
At least 100 dead in Kentucky tornadoes
A devastating storm system has swept through the United States, producing numerous tornadoes.
More than 100 deaths could be attributed to the storm alone in Kentucky.
The pictures from there remind of a war zone.
On Saturday night, multiple tornadoes caused severe damage in the United States and possibly hundreds of deaths.
The storms left a roughly 320-mile-long path of destruction, especially in the state of Kentucky.
Its governor, Andy Beshear, said after a visit to the disaster zone that everything was gone everywhere the tornado had swept through.
Houses, shops, government buildings - gone.
Parts of industrial plants, roofs are in the trees.
It is hard to imagine that this is even possible.
He is expecting up to 100 deaths alone in the state of Kentucky, and the official figures are rising by the hour.
Hello, I just saw that the Vitrine #NAME# is sold out.
That's very disappointing.
Is it still being produced?
Or is it completely out of stock?
Is it possible to order this cabinet in another country?
When do you report yourself?
If the delivery cannot be made to my apartment, I must cancel the order!
I understand, but can I order the ceiling now and have it delivered to Germany in the basket?
I had returned the contact form or abandoned it and wanted to ask if it had arrived or was being processed, as I had not yet received a confirmation.
Companies pay for vaccinations and change advertising slogans
While the federal government continues to reject proposals for a vaccination bonus, companies in Austria have themselves taken the initiative and are offering their employees a vaccination bonus.
They are on the same line as the social partners ÖGB and the Chamber of Commerce, who today called for financial incentives to get vaccinated.
The reworking of advertising slogans into calls for vaccinations - in German style - is also intended to increase the willingness to get vaccinated against Corona.
He moved to a company over which he had grumped.
That doesn't make his situation any better than yours.
Wait and drink tea.
It's been a year.
He has obviously not stuck to his old job and has been looking for something else.
You can do that too.
And that he didn't like you back then: well, that's fine.
He didn't like his job either.
There are too many variables.
Please cancel the reservation.
That will then be relevant in a legal sense.
I take a screenshot.
Guten Tag - ich interessiere mich für den Esstisch von Boone, Weiß.
Is there one in 230cm?
We offer all Smeg kitchen appliances and the corresponding accessories in our online shop kitchenpoint.de.
We generally check the quality and completeness of your order.
The new Smeg coffee pod machine brings freshly ground coffee to your kitchen or office.
The simple and reduced design, the plastic surface in matt colours in combination with the matt-brushed stainless steel front makes the new SMEG coffee machine with milk frother a design object.
The reduced design allows all functions, such as grind size and water amount, as well as the choice between espresso, Americano, ristretto or a mild coffee with only four buttons.
Thanks to the steam nozzle, it is also possible to prepare coffee milk and milk foam specialities.
Help with first own campaign
Boron to the rescue!
I'm currently running a group of four friends through the adventure Over the Grey Pass, and I want to seamlessly lead my heroes into a campaign specifically written for the players.
We are playing DSA 5.
The big picture is there, the bad guys and their motivations written, the individual acts imagined, and now I'm writing the opening adventure and already stumbling over my own feet at the first encounter.
The premise is that the heroes are to deliver a cartload of grain from Gratenfels to a small village near Lake Thuran.
Here, the further course of action will develop.
A mile or so from the village, the heroes are ambushed by a group of goblins and lured into an ambush.
I want to give the player characters the option to resolve confrontations in different ways: Persuade, act, threaten, recognize danger at an early stage, whatever suits the players.
Group size: 8 common goblins, 2 with spears, 6 with bows and swords armed
If unnoticed, the goblins lurk in a hollow and flank the hero, armed with bows, three to the left and three to the right, while two stop the cart with spears.
If it comes to a fight and the heroes are defeated, I have two solutions
1. The heroes are all knocked out and then found and healed by the son of the village schoolmaster, a half-elf.
The cart is of course gone.
2. If a defeat is inevitable, then this half-elf and two of his knights will come to the aid of the hero in the fight.
The cart is still there, everything is great.
How do you feel about the Deus ex Machina of solution 2?
Is the encounter too much of an introduction to the adventure?
The goblin group will later play a crucial role, so it's not just cannon fodder.
EDIT: Wow, I didn't expect so many answers, especially not so many great suggestions and tips.
I will guarantee that many of your ideas will be implemented and I now also have more confidence in my narratives.
I took the lamp apart again.
And again, they're stuck together.
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
So I would like to send them back
Can you then send me the receipts, then I can pack the lamp and bring it to #PRS_ORG#.
Shipping costs and time saved - and at the same time the environment is spared!
If you need more than one article, please click "Pay now" only when you have all the articles in your shopping cart.
So the combi delivery is automatically calculated and you get everything in one package.
By doing this, you save yourself the multiple purchases/payments and the environment is happy as no unnecessary packaging and unnecessary fuel is used for the delivery of multiple packages.
Faster delivery with DHL, DPD and Deutsche Post!
We usually dispatch your order on the same working day if payment is received by 14:00.
So that your package can reach you as quickly as possible, please make sure that your address is complete and that your name is also on your mailbox and doorbell.
Would you like us to send your parcel to a parcel station?
Then please choose DHL, because only DHL can deliver at DHL Parcel stations.
We will send you an email with the tracking number if you have chosen DHL or DPD as your shipping provider.
So you can already see where your parcel is from around 22:00.
Your satisfaction is our goal - all five stars count!
If you are satisfied with us, we would be delighted if you would rate us positively and give us all five stars for the detailed reviews.
If at any time you are not completely satisfied, we would be grateful if you would let us know before you leave a review.
That's how we have the chance to do everything we can to make you happy.
We have nothing to do with the chair.
All of a sudden there was a crack
I was just sitting there
Here was the lower part, which is to say the part with the storage space damaged.
Will everything be picked up again or just the storage space?
I'm sick of Sky Sport F1
Hello dear F1 fans, over the course of the season the quality on German Sky has steadily declined, so I want to make a little air with this post.
First of all, the transmission was interrupted today in the middle of the F2 race so that the F1 pre-race coverage could begin on time.
Although the schedule was far behind the plan due to the delayed start and the accident, it would have been possible to show the last (planned) ten minutes as well as the championship decision!
Apparently, however, this is the case because of legal reasons, so that everything else has to be restricted, meaning that Sky DE had no choice.
Still daft, though, given Sky UK was covering the race.
Nevertheless, a small compliment: the commentator Olivier Zwartyes has managed the difficult situation around the serious accident well.
Then there was a lack of knowledge of the rules in F1 when commentators Sascha Roos and Ralf Schumacher did not know that it is allowed to change tyres under a red flag.
Although this situation has already occurred in Imola, Baku and Silverstone this year, both drivers only agreed that Verstappen should be allowed to change his tyres when there were relevant radio messages on the subject to Hamilton.
Both commentators on Sky UK and RTL knew immediately that this was an option for Verstappen.
I think you should know such basic rules if you're commentating on a pay-TV channel for Formula 1.
It is also not the first time that now, according to the rules, it is possible or required, both have simply persistent uncertainties about the subject of the rules.
Generally, Roos does not like the scripted commentary style of Roos, but admits that it is a matter of taste.
But Heiko Wasser from RTL is even more serious for me.
In addition, there are constant absurdities that both simply look unprofessional, such as ordering coffee from (equally clueless) reporter Peter Hardenacke or "UuuuuHD" from Ralf Schumacher.
The latter, in particular, has caused a lot of trouble in the comments, which he apparently does not take seriously.
Not least, the advertising simply takes over at Sky, in the final round Sky is the only broadcaster that goes into advertising, as can be heard on F1TV, where only the German soundtrack without commentary can be heard directly after the race.
Neither ServusTV nor ORF do this.
These two channels also make less advertising than Sky, and that as a free-to-air broadcaster.
Glock and Baumgartner must be praised for their work, but that alone does not make me overlook the disadvantages.
The rest of Sky Sport F1's programme is also very poor and full of repeats.
Sky is really the worst German-speaking broadcaster to cover the F1.
Unironically, RTL does a better job on the four races they are still allowed to broadcast, apart from the advertising.
In any case, the grandiose F1 season makes a lot less fun than it would be with a decent broadcaster.
I would like to know what you think.
Here: #PRS_ORG# pendulum light, brass and coloured glass x 1
Hello, I have an article that was supposed to be delivered last week and is still not delivered.
I have contacted the chat twice and so far nothing.
The First Lady told me it would be sent out on Monday, the Second Lady told me yesterday that she would check and send an email and never did.
Hello, I ordered two #PRS_ORG# on 12.12.19.
One of them has already shown a defect (the material has a hole in the front part of the seat).
I ask for your support.
Air pumps are ideal for supplementing an aquarium with additional oxygen.
It is also possible to operate a filter system using an air pump.
This series is offered in three different versions.
Check the table at the end of the offer.
Here you can see the services side by side.
If the pumps are strong enough, you can run an entire system with them.
If you have a large aquarium, pumps with 2 or more outlets are suitable so that you can connect more than one outlet.
The MK series has one, two or four outlets, depending on the model, but the ventilation pump also offers the option of setting an accent in the aquarium, e.g. with an air curtain (find them in our shop) or with a decoration that turns the air bubbles into a function.
Here one could call a treasure chest, a mussel or the like.
The MK series has a special, sound-insulated construction, which results in low operating noise.
The installation is very easy.
The fan pump is connected to the extractor via a 4/6 mm air hose...and it's ready to go.
The fan pump should be the same or higher than the water level and mounted outside.
If the fan pump is deeper than the water level, you should install a check valve in between.
Just cut the air hose and put the valve in between.
This would prevent it if the water were to run backwards, which would cause the water from the basin to flow through the pump...
If the fan pump is to be placed outside, it should be covered and protected from moisture
The MK series pumps are pure power packages that consume little energy
Even though we state a processing time of 3 days on eBay, the parcels are packed and collected every day.
Everything goes well on the way, it goes very quickly.
We just wanted to make sure that no one was confused, just because it took a little bit longer.
It would be different if everyone understood the whole staff, who also work in the forwarding industry...of course, Corona doesn't stop here.
Please do not rate it badly just because the delivery is delayed, this is only due to the parcel services.
Of course, one likes to mock these services, even though we are saying right now... they have it really hard
This is also very different regionally.
Don't be mean to anyone, stay healthy and we all hope that better times will come again.
How long does it take to order the yellow ones with and without armrests?
Can you also order the legs in a lighter colour?
Amazon founder Bezos sends astronaut daughter and host into space
The daughter of the first American in space, a TV presenter and four other passengers have taken a short trip into space.
They were transported on Saturday by the rocket system "New Shepard" of the Blue Origin company, founded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
The roughly ten-minute flight took place in the western part of the US state of Texas.
Under a bright blue sky, Bezos personally welcomed the newly-minted astronauts upon their return.
"Welcome back," said Bezos, dressed in a blue flight suit as he opened the hatch to the capsule.
The six passengers climbed out one by one, cheered on by friends, family and Blue Origin employees, and embraced Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
According to Blue Origin, they were airborne for 10 minutes and 13 seconds, reaching an altitude of 107 kilometers.
The 74-year-old Laura Shepard Churchley, daughter of the 1961 NASA astronaut Alan Shepard (1923-1998), who was the first to fly into space, and the 50-year-old TV presenter Michael Strahan were guests of the company, and the other four passengers paid for their tickets: space engineer Dylan Taylor, investor Evan Dick, technology entrepreneur Lane Bess and his son Cameron.
Blue Origin did not disclose how much each person paid for their ticket.
Laura Shepard Churchley recalled her father's mission after the short flight.
He's worked hard and done everything himself on his missions.
She just went along with it, the 74-year-old said with a laugh.
Michael Strahan also expressed his enthusiasm.
He would love to go back into space, said the moderator.
New Shepard flies up to 100 km
The rocket system "New Shepard" flies largely automatically.
The capsule separated from the rocket during the flight and reached an altitude of around 100 kilometres above the Earth, briefly experiencing weightlessness before the reusable object was slowed by large parachutes and landed.
The International Civil Aviation Organization and many other experts consider 100 kilometers above the Earth to be the boundary between airspace and space, but there is no binding international regulation.
It was Blue Origin's third manned flight, with Amazon founder Bezos on board with his brother Mark, an 82-year-old former US pilot, and an 18-year-old Dutchman.
The second, in October, was attended by the 90-year-old Canadian actor William Shatner, who became famous for his role as "Captain Kirk" in "Star Trek", as well as the former Nasa engineer Chris Boshuizen, the entrepreneur Glen de Vries and the vice president of Blue Origin, Audrey Powers.
Critics say Bezos and Blue Origin are pushing the space tourism business largely without scientific research interests for the betterment of humanity and without regard for the climate.
With a single press of a button, you can easily choose whether your "smart stone" should permanently light up in one colour or whether it should play through its entire colour palette.
Once the color is changed, the lightbulb will hold a light color for around one minute before gently transitioning to the next decorative color.
The solid construction of the "Smart Stone" light is impervious to the elements.
In snowy surroundings, its light even performs particularly well - only with a shortened duration of light will you have to expect this once the days become shorter.
Please make sure that snow does not affect the solar panel's function in winter.
"Smart Stone" uses a NiMh battery in the common Mignon (AA) format, which can be easily replaced as and when required.
You can obtain a suitable replacement battery from our online shop and thus extend the service life of your decolight even further.
A high-gloss effect spray that makes smooth surfaces look like chrome.
Suitable for all smooth surfaces, in particular for the design of wheels, wheel arches, and coated plastic parts, following appropriate pre-treatment.
With this product, DUPLI-COLOR is offering for the first time a washable and weatherproof chromium spray.
The optimal effect is achieved on black backgrounds, e.g. by pre-treating with DUPLI-COLOR TUNING Effect Primer.
Available as a single dose and in a set including an effect primer and dust-binding cloth for optimal preparation of the painting.
For use on metal, wood, glass, lacquered hard plastics, stone.
Perfect, that's what I was looking for :) Do I need to add anything else?
They just need the tracking number in my email?
Someone who works in biochemistry or is studying biochemistry
I am currently studying in the first semester of biochemistry and find the subject itself quite interesting, and the lab work doesn't bother me (I have already completed the inorganic chemistry practical).
I have also already been informed about career prospects before my studies, but at that time I also thought that I would definitely study until I got my doctorate.
At the moment, however, I have doubts, especially concerning my career prospects.
On one side (Studycheck etc), one hears again and again of great career opportunities and the profession is totally in demand, on the other side one hears again and again of unemployed biologists and appallingly low-paid jobs.
So I would really be interested in:
1) What is she currently working on?
2) Are you satisfied with your work/salary?
3) What have you studied/ What training have you done?
4) Would you do it all again?
Thank you for your answers!
I am currently really unsure and am thinking about dropping out of my studies in 2022 and doing an apprenticeship as a specialist in computer science.
If you have experience with this, they also like to share :)
Extra stress during holidays and weekends
This topic came up last week with me.
But now I had to use my long weekend to relax.
That's why it's only now a post about it.
Not only during major holidays, such as Christmas holidays, there is a lot of stress in our company.
As it seems, there are also these on holiday plus bridge days.
It was like this: Last week was the Assumption, which we call "Auffahrt" in Switzerland.
On Friday, most people and businesses take a bridge day, which is semi-official.
Last week, therefore, a long 4-day weekend was on the cards.
What happened last week?
Everywhere stress.
Loads of emails that had to be sent before leaving, jobs here, jobs there, everything *absolutely* before the long weekend.
Because... yes, because?
Because "next week" sounds so far away after so much time and that can't be?
Or because people really want to do as much in a shortened week as they would in a normal one?
Not only was I stressed on Wednesday, but I was also powerfully annoyed.
What is this self-indulgence for holidays?
Why do we have holidays if we can't properly enjoy them?!
The stress didn't come from above, the colleagues were all very self-sufficient in dealing with it.
My question is simply: Are we the only ones like this, the Swiss?
Is that our Reformed-Evangelical way?
Or do you know that in the north as well?
Yvonne Catterfeld is looking forward to Christmas in Thuringia
Yvonne Catterfeld (42) is looking forward to Christmas in her native Thuringia - but has no presents yet.
"Even if there is no snow in Erfurt, you just go to Ilmenau in the Thuringian Forest," said the actress and singer Hit Radio FFH.
She will agree to the festival by baking and building with her son.
"I love it," said Catterfeld.
However, she still has a lot to do until the contemplative days: "For the first time, I haven't received any presents yet - I have to get going now."
NEKTON-Bio supports a smooth moulting and feather growth process.
NEKTON-Bio contains all essential vitamins, amino acids, minerals, trace elements and 200,000 µg of biotin/kg.
NEKTON-Bio gives the bird a smooth and shiny plumage.
The majority of feather damage in the poultry industry is due to nutritional errors.
Since the plumage is made of protein-containing substances, a particularly rich and balanced protein diet for the bird is a prerequisite for the formation of a perfect feather covering.
For a functioning metabolism, the daily diet must contain sufficient vitamins, minerals and trace elements.
The majority of the animal losses that occur during the moult are due to inadequate or unbalanced protein intake and/or insufficient supply of vitamins and minerals.
The unfavourable ratio of amino acids in most plant-based foods is explicitly taken into account and balanced in the composition of NEKTON-Bio.
No further vitamin preparations should be administered while NEKTON-Bio is being applied.
NEKTON Bio is water-soluble and can be administered either via the drinking water or via the soft food.
Thank you, I found it
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work
DDR-Handarbeitsmodell Altbau E-Lok E 95 03 DRG/ DR, the loco was in use in Silesia and Central Germany, the very rare loco probably comes from the model railway enthusiast magazine ME Heft 11/1968, see photos, the function is good, the E 95 series is a heavy goods train electric locomotive of the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft (DRG), it was designed for the traction of heavy coal trains in the Silesian network, possibly the kit comes from the small-scale firm ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN.
A locomotive is on display at the DB Museum in Halle (Saale) and has been restored to working order
In 1924, the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft commissioned AEG to draw up proposals for an electric locomotive that should be able to haul 2,200-tonne freight trains and 530-tonne passenger trains at a speed of 45 km/h.
A maximum speed of 65 km/h was required.
Thus, the DRG determined in March 1926 that the delivery would be as a 1'Co+Co1' locomotive with Tatzlager drive from AEG and the delivery of the mechanical parts by the Siemens-Schuckertwerke with the electrical parts.
Between December 1927 and June 1928, six locomotives were delivered, which received the operating numbers E 95 01–06.
All survived the Second World War and found themselves again on the territory of the later GDR.
In 1946, the locomotives were delivered as reparations to the Soviet Union.
They returned to Germany by November 1952.
The suitability of all six locomotives for restoration was established at the Federal Railway Repair Works in Dessau.
[4] As the electrification of the Mitteldeutsche Netz progressed, there was an increasing need for locomotives for the heavy goods train service, and in 1959, the three locomotives E 95 01 to E 95 03 were modernised, with the other machines serving as spare parts suppliers.
First, the E 04, E 44 and E 94, which were available in large quantities, were preferred.
Only when it became clear that the E 94 would not be able to increase its throughput, did the E 95 come back into focus in the process of rehabilitation.
[4] Initially, the locomotives were stationed at the Leipzig-Wahren railway depot.
They came to the railway workshop Halle P. in 1960.
They were used in their own timetable to haul coal from the Geiseltal to Halle, Leipzig and Erfurt.
With increasing age, the complex control of the locomotives became problematic.
This often resulted in gunmen sticking to their guns.
Then the on-board helper, who was always with the train, had to use a hammer and a wood-chisel to uncouple the gunner during the journey.
Damage to the traction motors was frequent and led to months of downtime for the locomotive.
[5] By the end of the 1960s, there were enough new locomotives in stock and the electrification of the network was not planned at that time, so the Reichsbahn could dispense with old locomotives and most of the branch lines, so that the E 95 was taken out of service.
In addition, Deutsche Reichsbahn wanted to operate its electric locomotives with only one crew member, which would have posed a problem in the operation of the trains due to the aforementioned difficulties with the machines and the view from the driver's cab.
[5] After mid-1969, E 95 02 and E 95 03 were withdrawn, followed by E 95 01, which retired on 5 October 1970.
The intended new designation 255 001 was thus never used.
All the locomotives were dismantled except for E 95 02.
The E 95 02 was set up as a replacement for the future museum locomotive E 77 10 as a switch heater at the main station in Halle.
It took some time before the responsible persons at the Reichsbahn could be convinced that the E 95 was worth saving as a museum locomotive.
In 1979, the initial external restoration of the locomotive began with the goal of presenting it at a vehicle show in RAW Dessau.
[5] Since then, it has been part of the Dresden Transport Museum as a non-operational museum locomotive.
In 1986, the internal completion of the locomotive was completed.
The locomotive is maintained in the DB Museum in Halle (Saale).
Since 1995, employees of the tradition community Bw Halle P have been working on the operational readiness of the locomotive.
In April 2015, the locomotive could be presented for the first time at an exhibition in the Museum-Bw Arnstadt with a new interior and exterior livery, with the transformers checked and five driving motors being operational.
The locomotives were in use on the Silesian Mountain Railway and the branch lines until 1945, where they proved their worth due to their reliable drive and low maintenance requirements.
In February 1945, the machines were moved to Leipzig to be integrated into the Mitteldeutsche Netz.
The main area of operation was initially Silesia
Handwork model H0 in OVP, functioning well, optical work on the locomotive in own work is necessary, stripped, with play tracks, cellar smell !!!, very rare handwork model, very small edition - possibly the building kit also comes from the small-series firm ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN
The packaging may have labels and storage marks.
Yes, the F-parts are it
I got a bed from you.
However, there were problems with one part.
The middle beam is held up by two feet...unfortunately, these are too narrow and the beam cannot be mounted on the feet.
What are we doing now?
I can't put the bed together.
The middle beam is held up by two feet, which are unfortunately faulty.
The middle beam does not fit into the intended mounting.
So I get new ones sent to me.
When will they be released?
No, no flat ones.
According to the assembly instructions, these are the correct ones, they were just too narrow
But that doesn't matter.
As long as they fulfill their purpose
They are not flat with me
Could I get a copy of this sent to me?
Hello #NAME#, can I explain the problem to you again?
House fire with two minor injuries and high damage
Two people were slightly injured in a fire in a house in Upper Bavaria.
In addition, an estimated €60,000 worth of damage has been caused, police said on Sunday.
The fire had probably spread from a carport to the adjacent house in Kinsau (district of Landsberg am Lech).
According to reports, two residents were taken to hospital on Sunday with mild smoke poisoning.
The exact cause of the fire was not known at first, but the police did not consider it to have been deliberately set.
The Criminal Investigation Department of Fürstenfeldbruck has taken over the further investigation.
But it comes later
And I have to pay shipping costs again
To debunk fake news - Biontech CEO publishes vaccine photo
Uğur Şahin published a photo of his first vaccination on the social network "LinkedIn" in early 2021
Biontech CEO Uğur Şahin has not publicly commented on his vaccination status.
Now the entrepreneur has published a photo showing his coronavirus vaccination.
The illness of a friend has prompted Şahin to speak out.
The CEO and co-founder of the Mainz-based company Biontech, Uğur Şahin, posted a photo showing him receiving a coronavirus vaccine.
On social media, there were false claims that I was not vaccinated.
In fact, my wife and I have received three doses of the Biontech-Pfizer vaccine," Şahin wrote in a post on the network "LinkedIn" on Friday.
"For months, friends have been urging me to post a photo of me getting the vaccine to counter the false rumors."
So far, he has rejected it because the communication should not revolve around him.
But a call last week has changed his mind: "I was deeply saddened to learn that one of my old school friends is currently fighting for his life.
He is fighting a severe Covid-19 infection and has been on a ventilator for three weeks.
The school friend and his family were not vaccinated, Şahin continued.
He did not ask for the reasons.
"The most common cause, however, appears to be fear, which is often stoked by misinformation and mistrust."
Fear can only be fought with facts, sometimes it is better to share personal experiences.
An interview with Deutsche Welle is circulating on the internet in which Uğur Şahin says he is not vaccinated.
However, the video was created in December 2020, as the Deutsche Welle itself clarified.
"I am currently not allowed to get the vaccine myself," Şahin said at the time.
There is a priority in Germany for the vaccination of the vaccine.
Now the prioritisation has been lifted - and the Biontech boss has himself been vaccinated three times, according to his own statements.
Fire in substation: tens of thousands of people without power
In several municipalities in North Rhine-Westphalia, the lights went out on Friday evening: no electricity and in many cases no heating either.
A fire had disabled a substation.
Tens of thousands of people in the Rhein-Sieg-Kreis in North Rhine-Westphalia had to go without power for around 24 hours after a fire in a substation.
On Friday evening, 41,000 residents and residents in several municipalities turned off the lights due to the fire.
Westnetz reported that numerous emergency power supplies were in operation on Saturday until the widespread outage was finally resolved late in the evening.
Firefighters and helpers and helpers from the THW provided support in the municipalities.
Authorities offered places in schools and appealed for neighbours to help.
The supplier thanked the affected parties for their patience and the helpers for their efforts.
We are very aware that the last 24 hours have brought significant restrictions.
We also thank the affected municipalities, the district, the fire services and the German Red Cross for their tireless efforts," said the head of the primary technology division, Florian Witt, in a statement on Saturday evening.
The repairs to the damage will take a few more days, as the Westnet engineers were only able to restore some of the cables temporarily, he explained.
The fire was caused by a technical fault, according to the company.
Electricity is flowing again
The fire, which broke out at around 7.15 pm on Friday, has heavily damaged parts of the 10,000-volt switchgear at the Neunkirchen-Seelscheid substation, according to Westnetz.
There are extensive cleaning and repair works to be carried out there.
At the same time, a connection to a 30,000-volt level has been created.
With this bypass, the power supply is restored.
Since Saturday 6pm, over 21,000 people in Much and Ruppichteroth have had electricity again.
Another 20,000 residents of Neunkirchen-Seelscheid were gradually connected from 21.30 p.m.
Since 23.15, the last of the affected people have also had power restored.
More than 80 Westnet and partner engineers were on the scene.
Authorities had also called for help from neighbours on Saturday afternoon after setting up emergency power supplies for important buildings.
"It is now important that citizens look after older or single people in their neighbourhood and let the local fire station know if help is needed," explained District Administrator Sebastian Schuster (CDU) after a crisis meeting.
The focus was on the residents of nursing homes when setting up and operating emergency power systems.
In addition, according to authorities, temporary care facilities have been set up in schools for those people who were unable to care for themselves or who required medical devices that were not powered by electricity, or who required medical care.
Guten Tag!
Unfortunately, the ceiling is sold out in Germany.
Can I buy it from you and pay in euros?
It is the daily cover #PRS_ORG# in blue-green.
I hope you have a nice day and stay healthy ♡
But I can't mount the stand on the table top.
It is Custom #NAME#.
There are three versions of this.
We wanted those with table tops with a diameter of #NUMBER#
We received a diameter of 155 cm.
Today my #PRS_ORG# arrived, but I can't fit it in and thus shorten it.
Can you help me with that?
Otherwise I would have to send them back, because otherwise they would not be suitable for the purpose.
I would be delighted to receive feedback
Yes, that's really easy!
Then we do it!
Can you send me the return receipt by email?
The repairs are now complete.
I had already tried this before the chat.
However, I had not restarted the e-#PRS_ORG# before the purchase.
Should I do that now?
I find it almost insulting to get such a low credit rating.
We are not in agreement with this
Nordic combined: Kombiner Riiber wins
The German Nordic combined athletes Fabian Rießle and Julian Schmid have been on the podium at the World Cup in Otepää, Estonia.
The duo had to give way once again to the outstanding Norwegian Jarl Magnus Riiber, who had already started the race with a big lead after the ski jumping.
Return the order number #NUMBER#
When will the money be transferred back to my account?
Yes, we both made it new and use version 4.5...
It could be that they have heard about the problem before
I bought a book directly with my #PRS_ORG#, it seems to be on there too.
When I try to open it, the message pops up, ups!
This document could not be opened.
File a possible error report to customer service.
As far as I can tell it is a #PRS_ORG# epub file.
Can you help me further?
Chat connection is down and now?
I also have to work in between!
So that the paint job is even and clean, you should clean the parts with soapy water to remove dust, grease and fingerprints, rinse them with clear water and dry them.
Before you use the paintbrush for the first time with a new color, it's a good idea to practice 2 to 3 strokes.
You can do this on the inside of the components that are not visible or on a yoghurt pot.
The first mark on the component
Draw the brush in a straight line, stroke by stroke.
A slight overlap of the colour layers later results in an even surface.
Avoid fast back and forth wiping with the brush.
This results in unrealistic areas.
A model is not a garden fence.
Start with the bright colours.
The dark ones could otherwise later show through.
Metallic tones and metallic colours come in at the end with a separate brush.
Otherwise, it can result in unsightly metal flecks when mixed with normal colours.
Let the painted parts dry for a day before varnishing.
The models achieve an authentic appearance through decals or stickers.
From flags on aircraft to ship names, to stripes and markings on car models: the decals give the model the final touch.
Bring the decals in the correct order to the parts that are still accessible.
A cockpit can be/easily fitted before it is fitted into the fuselage.
More important than the right tool, like a pair of scissors, pliers and tweezers, is time, patience and a steady hand.
Cut out each decal individually and lay them out for you.
Decals are also called water transfer images because you briefly wet the back with water until the backing paper turns dark with the moisture.
Then you move the picture a little bit off the paper and place the piece on the corresponding place on the model (which you also wet beforehand).
While holding the decal on the model with a tool, you pull the backing paper away from the model.
Caution: Always check first that the picture is correctly positioned before you remove it from the paper, so that it doesn't stick, knit or even tear.
Excess water can be absorbed with a household towel.
Not suitable for children under 3 years
I can only open a book for a short time when I look away, then I can no longer read the book and have to log out and log in again and load the book again and look for the place where I left off.
On Saturday, I already communicated with you.
Did I get this by email?
Also for all 3 packages?
Because the lamp came in 3 separate packages to me
Thank you very much anyway!
Then I will buy elsewhere as soon as the money comes back.
But will I get it back without any problems?
Infertility treatment with PKV / What is a "covered event"?
Hello everyone,
We were in fertility treatment for a long time, now that it's time to pay the PKV bill, it suddenly turns against us.
In order:
We had the child wish exchange in advance with the PKV and received the approval for three attempts.
The experiments were not limited in any way (e.g. time frame, success, etc.).
The first attempt resulted in a successful pregnancy and birth, and was covered by the PKV.
Some time later we tried for a second child, and we carried out 2 (unsuccessful) attempts, but this was not taken into account by the PKV.
We applied again for reimbursement from the PKV and were granted another three attempts.
After some further attempts (we have carried out more tests than agreed, of course the most expensive ones with the health insurance company) we submitted the invoices to the health insurance company and received the unpleasant surprise: instead of 5 treatments (2+3) the health insurance company will only pay for 3 treatments.
The reason: Pregnancy/birth will forfeit the other two attempts at the first donation.
The second child is a new insurance case.
However, according to the AGB, "The insurance case begins with treatment and ends when treatment is no longer required."
The questions to the experts in the round here:
* Who is right, the PKV (only 3 attempts are reimbursed) or we (5 attempts to be reimbursed)?
* Would the PKV have pointed out to us in the assurances that with a birth the further attempts would fail?
* Is the desire for a second child really a new insurance case?
Infertility (caused by blocked fallopian tubes) is not cured by the first child.
It would be great if the experts here could share their opinions.
Many thanks already for your help!
Could you please send me the three versions by email and tell me how I can best reach them?
Okay.
We will no longer order anything from them.
When they add up my sales and my friend #NAME# (same address) they have obviously lost a good customer.
They can pass this on to their managers if they wish.
That's not competitive.
Yesterday, my colleague told me that the refund was processed and now you're telling me that I have to return the thing.
I can't do anything about the fact that the wardrobe is completely dishevelled when it arrives at my house
Please see the screenshot of what the colleague wrote
It is clearly stated that the refund was triggered and I have still not received a refund via #PRS_ORG#
They can inform their manager that they have now lost two regular customers.
My friend also ordered various furniture for our apartment through his account.
We will not do that anymore.
No, the defect only appeared after a few months.
An office chair must be able to withstand normal use.
Otherwise they can't sell it as an office chair.
Regardless of this, the guarantee of 24 months applies.
No, I am not able to get another type of packaging.
I will dismantle the cabinet and make it available to the transport company.
Guten Tag, ich habe eine Frage zu Ihrer Serie von #PRS_ORG#
These products are advertised with additional hoops to earn, but we can't find them for you here.
Can they help?
The theme of the week: the best low budget films
What a low-budget film is, there is no general definition with exact budget limits.
Wikipedia has this to say on the matter:
A **low-budget film** or **low-budget movie** is a motion picture shot with little to no funding from a major film studio or private investor.
On the web, you can find plenty of lists of low-budget films, such as on Letterboxd.com.
Do you know interesting representatives of this category?
What do you find irritating about it?
And what do you dislike in particular?
I am a very good customer of yours, and have already completely furnished two apartments with your furniture.
Wanted to ask the best price for the grey leather sofa Odelle.
The delivery time has now been extended again, is it now also reliable?
Thank you
Yours sincerely
If there is no phone number, a chat where one has to wait 30 minutes is not a chat!
Unfortunately, nothing changes in the waiting position...I give up again soon because it just doesn't work here.
Hello
"Half victory" against Belarus with high costs for the EU
According to political expert Raphael Bossong, the EU can declare a "half victory" in the conflict with the Belarusian regime.
But the costs are very high and mean massive violations of the rights of migrants and refugees at the Belarus border with Poland and Lithuania," Bossong told the Evangelische Pressedienst (epd).
The EU has not been able to resolve the confrontation, the researcher of the Berlin Foundation for Science and Policy (SWP) explained.
This state of suspension - Belarus is not quite small, but the EU feels like a winner - will go on for a while.
The treatment of people at the border was not in line with the European Convention on Human Rights, said Bossong.
Apparently, there is an "increasing normalization of pushbacks" by individual EU governments.
Since the EU as a whole is not determined against it, this is at the expense of basic rights.
This development also weakens the cohesion in the Union.
"It cannot be implemented if a member state sets its mind to it," as currently Poland, which does not even allow Frontex, the EU border protection agency, access to its borders.
In addition, the EU is paying a further price for its policy on the border with Belarus, according to Bossong: An agreement on the basic principles of asylum policy is being made more difficult because the line "border protection, border protection, border protection" has been strengthened.
Another attempt to cross the border
According to information from Poland's border protection, migrants have again attempted to reach Polish territory via Belarus.
55 migrants were detained overnight Saturday and returned to the border, a spokeswoman for the agency said Sunday.
The Polish officials were pelted with stones by the migrants near the village of Czeremsza.
According to reports, a soldier was hit in the face and had to be medically treated by a military doctor.
A total of 52 attempted border crossings were registered within 24 hours.
On Friday evening, a group of 28 migrants had already overcome the border barriers.
Thousands of people from countries like Iraq and Afghanistan have crossed or tried to cross the border between Belarus and the EU in recent months.
The EU accuses Alexander Lukaschenko, the ruler of Minsk, of having lured them with the prospect of entry into the EU.
According to press reports, Poland and Lithuania have demarcated the border.
The EU sanctioned Belarus and threatened airlines that brought migrants and refugees into the country.
In addition, EU commissioners are travelling to the countries of origin of the people in order to prevent them from leaving.
The most effective element of the EU reaction was the pressure on the airlines, said Bossong.
"The EU has thrown its market power into the balance and demonstrated its resolve with hard bandages and extraterritorial sanctions."
Minsk must also take into account the political costs at home.
The Belarusian society is not likely to be happy about the security apparatus regularly shipping thousands of people through the country.
Mercedes protests after controversial Formula One finale
Max Verstappen is said to have committed two rule breaches during the race, according to Mercedes.
Abu Dhabi - After the controversial Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi, Mercedes has lodged an appeal.
The silver arrows appear to have broken two rules in the last Grand Prix of the year.
A protest relates to a perceived infringement by Max Verstappen in the Red Bull during the last Safety Car phase, when he is alleged to have illegally overtaken.
A second appeal was lodged against the judgement at the end of the race.
According to Mercedes, the protocol was not followed.
Verstappen overtook Lewis Hamilton in the Mercedes on the last lap to win his first Formula One title.
The manoeuvre came shortly after the end of a safety car phase in which the Dutchman had overtaken the car in front of him.
I'll check that.
I'm speaking with the bank and I'll be in touch with you again
Thanks for the support
Free admission for members: Europa-Park hosts SC Freiburg fantag
The Europa Park, the namesake of the Europa Park Stadium of the Sport-Club Freiburg, has invited the SC Freiburg fans.
As the park reports, members and season ticket holders of the Sport-Club from the Breisgau as well as members of the fan community were able to visit the Europa-Park free of charge on this day.
In addition, there were vouchers for drinks and sausages.
On this day, the roller coaster trains shone through the jerseys in red and white.
Fuchsle, the Euromouse and many red and white balloons provided the perfect backdrop," the park said.
The cooperation between the Bundesliga club and the leisure park in Rust, 40 kilometres north of Freiburg, has existed since the early 1990s.
The first SC Freiburg Fantag at Europa-Park has once again shown how well the partnership fits.
Seeing the enthusiastic fans having fun on the roller coaster confirms this," says Europa-Park owner Jürgen Mack.
Why is it €#NUMBER# and not €1699 as originally?
Steps in the career of the new world champion Verstappen
The Dutchman Max Verstappen is the new Formula 1 world champion.
Max Verstappen has done it.
The Dutchman has won his first world title with Red Bull in his seventh year in Formula 1.
His path to the top of the king class:
Abu Dhabi - 2012, Italy: After a crash in Sarno, Verstappen lost the karting world championship.
Father Jos Verstappen left him standing at a petrol station on the way back, angry.
His mother, Sophie Kumpen, is picking up the teenager in the car behind.
2014, England: Red Bull's junior team gets a promising young driver in Verstappen.
The 16-year-old is following in the footsteps of Sebastian Vettel and Daniel Ricciardo.
He then continues to compete in European Formula 3 for the time being.
2015, Australia: Verstappen started the 2015 Australian Grand Prix at the age of 17 years and 166 days, making him the youngest driver in history to start a Grand Prix.
He had to retire his Toro Rosso prematurely in Melbourne due to a defect.
2015, Malaysia: The then Toro Rosso driver Verstappen was also the youngest driver to score points in Formula 1 at 17 years and 180 days.
Verstappen finished seventh in the Malaysian Grand Prix at Sepang.
2016, Spain: In his first race for Red Bull, Verstappen wins.
At 18 years and 228 days, he becomes the youngest Formula 1 Grand Prix winner in history in Barcelona.
2019, Hungary: Verstappen celebrates his first pole position in Budapest - he is not the youngest.
At the age of 21, he left behind Valtteri Bottas and his Mercedes team-mate Lewis Hamilton.
2021, Abu Dhabi: The summit has been reached.
Verstappen celebrates his first Formula 1 world title at the age of 24 in the Abu Dhabi finale - with an overtake against Hamilton in the final round. dpa
I had #NUMBER# with you already when I ordered the #PRS_ORG# chest of drawers.
Judith Hermann read from her novel "At Home"
As part of the reading series "LiteraTour Nord," author Judith Hermann read from her current novel, "Daheim," on Friday at the sold-out Blue Note, and served as a moderator.
She is divorced, lives in a house by the coast and listens sensitively to the nocturnal sounds of her front door.
I filled out the return contact form yesterday, but did not receive an email confirmation or anything like that.
My question is whether my request has been acknowledged.
Not everyone has the time for your botched chat and cheap Chinese goods.
Their mistake, which they rectify and not all from our household.
Contact Ms #NAME#.
I can't chat with them every day
We chatted yesterday and agreed that I/Mrs #NAME# would receive an email with a £60 voucher, a repeat order of the #PRS_ORG# nightstand and a return label.
This email has not yet been received.
The package is still to be delivered to #PRS_ORG# today.
Please contact me
Yours sincerely
The LokSound 5 decoder can play up to 10 channels simultaneously.
Each channel can be decoded up to 16 bits / 31250 kHz and offers finally Hi-Fi quality on your system.
It is practically no longer audible above the original.
A Class-D audio output stage with up to 3W output power drives the speakers, which may have an impedance between 4 Ohm and 32 Ohm.
The huge 128 Mbit sound memory provides enough capacity.
All individual noises can be adjusted individually in volume.
The super-flexible sound engine without a fixed timetable allows the exact simulation of all conceivable rail vehicles.
Three independently adjustable braking functions and two alternative load scenarios give you maximum control over your vehicles.
Sorry but just because he says he's not antisemitic, that doesn't mean anything.
That's like when a foreigner says he has nothing against foreigners.
Neither of them will admit it.
But Kollegah constantly reproduces anti-Semitic messages.
If you want to distance yourself, then you should just do it completely.
Yes, then you are just as unserious as Kollegah.
Anyone who seriously questions evolution in general is just completely lost.
Somehow a god set it all in motion.
But once you become a creationist, you have to believe that the Earth is 10,000 years old and that science is full of nonsense.
And that makes you an enemy of science and not to be taken seriously like Kollegah
To achieve an optimal field of vision, the lens should be held as close as possible to the eye.
The specially designed aplanatic-achromatic lens system allows you to use the microscope practically error-free in the edge zone.
Lenses are often marked with magnification figures.
However, these figures only apply to precisely defined conditions, which rarely correspond to the conditions of use.
In order to make the most of your loupe, we ask you to take note of the information in the "Technical data" table (see the instructions in the packaging).
Light reflections occur on the lens surfaces of all optical devices, including impact scopes.
By applying an anti-reflective coating, these reflections are significantly reduced.
Reflections on the lens surfaces are less noticeable when the loupe is held close to the eye in optimal usage conditions - the loupe close to the eye.
Further information can be found in the accompanying user manual (available in German and English).
Zeiss VisuCard Lupe Scheckkartenlupe Vergrößerung Taschenlupe Leselupe Lesehilfe
Whether as a reading aid on the go or simply for the everyday trifles: the Zeiss VisuCard is the ideal helper, as it can be taken anywhere thanks to its compact format.
And their hard layer makes them robust against special stresses of the old age.
Each loupe comes with a credit card case for storage and safe transport.
They offer these parts, which you can see in the pictures or under "What we offer".
What condition is the offered article in?
Of course, everyone can make a mistake from time to time, after all, no one is perfect - should this be the case, simply write a message and it will be sorted out to your complete satisfaction (either by exchange, part refund or full refund).
They receive a proper invoice.
It is always sent, unless otherwise requested by the buyer, with a tracking number via DHL!
Please note that the individual shipping costs are to be found in the above shipping conditions.
There are no additional handling fees.
ok, say all the authorities, how can I check it more precisely?
Yes, both email addresses
#PRS_ORG# I will do a very nice and good service, although it took until I got to a person, you were super
Hello dear #PRS_ORG# team,
I have already reported to you under customer contact with the number #PHONENUMBER#.
Yes, but it was said before.
They cannot deliver to England due to #PRS_ORG.
Christmas tree sales in Schönwolde: In the Krembz district, women are looking for Christmas trees
Farmer Frank Diers has already experienced many curious situations when selling Christmas trees.
In one case, a man even drove his partner home alone because they couldn't agree.
Every year, he plants 2000 of them.
The 56-year-old has already experienced so many strange situations.
That makes the run-up to Christmas always a bit funny, he says.
And with the voucher?
Otherwise, I'm a customer?!
After all, I received a defective delivery, and now I paid the full price for it.
Then I will also evaluate it accordingly!
We don't need to discuss the better court here, but there is a certain similarity between the two.
Both consist of meat that is grilled on a rotating spit.
And both have their names.
In German, an equivalent might be something like the "twister," which doesn't sound nearly as tasty.
Problems with fibre + Devolo DLan/Magic
We have had a new fibre optic connection in the house for a few weeks.
Unfortunately, I have problems building a stable Wi-Fi network.
Previously I had a DSL 50 Mbit connection and used Devolo DLan, which received and sent 50 Mbit flawlessly, apart from a few glitches.
The new fibre optic connection sends 500 Mbit to the FritzBox 7590 and the DLan module connected to the FritzBox also receives these.
However, the other DLAN module, which transmits the Wi-Fi, no longer receives the full 500, but the fewer I am in the house with the module, the fewer it receives (i.e. use a socket that is 1, 2, 3, etc. rooms away from the other module).
This means that the Internet with the new fibre connection is now even slower on the first floor than before (\~45 Mbit).
I have also ordered a new Devolo Magic set, which apparently uses a new technology.
This was slightly better than the DLan, but here too there were similar large losses.
Could someone explain why so much internet speed is "lost" over the power line?
And is LAN really the only solution?
It would be extremely complicated to lay LAN cables in the house.
I am really desperate, which is why I have created an account just for this.
Therefore I would be all the more interested in an answer.
When it's time to change your giro account
Anyone who thought that, for now, there would be peace in the Giro accounts, has been fooled.
While many banks have used the autumn to remind their customers of past fee hikes with all sorts of tricks, the free allowances for negative interest rates are also continuing to fall.
For example, Deutsche Bank was considered relatively generous with a limit of 100,000 euros for a long time.
Now she has halved the lump sum and even quartered the daily rate.
In the first step, the limit was lowered only for customers of the Postbank division, to €50,000 for current and investment accounts and €25,000 for day-to-day accounts.
However, the lower fees now apply to the entire Deutsche Bank, as a spokesperson confirmed in response to a request.
And not only for new contracts, but also for "new individual agreements with existing customers".
The Commerzbank had already lowered the limit to 50,000 euros, which still applies, and the same applies to ING Germany.
The direct bank DKB, which is popular with cost-conscious customers, has reduced the allowances in two stages, first to 50,000 euros and now to 25,000 euros.
After all, more than 100 banks now have a minimum deposit of 25,000 euros or less, according to figures from the internet portal Verivox.
The Sparda Bank Berlin has also arrived at 25,000 euros: However, there is still a legal dispute with the consumer centres, which have already won a ruling in their favour in the first instance at the Berlin Land Court.
Now banks are discussing whether to set aside reserves - in the event that the higher courts also declare the negative interest rates to be unlawful and many millions of bank customers must be repaid.
Instead of the table for 6 people, they delivered the table for 8 people.
The lower one is for 6 people.
Jennifer Aniston has a whole beauty army
It now officially sits atop Hollywood.
But her life is like a roller-coaster.
Jennifer Aniston (52) was voted the most influential woman of the year by the US magazine "The Hollywood Reporter".
For her, the success of 2021 with the "Friends" reunion and the continuation of her series "The Morning Show" was above all the result of a lot of discipline and work.
A whole army of assistants, stylists and trainers are all working to make her look the way she does.
After all, Aniston says she only has one chip a day (yes, that's one CHIP out of the bag).
That they both appeal to the hearts of both female and male fans is actually a miracle.
Maybe because she's just unlucky in love - and still looking for that big love.
And the baby wish from the list has been crossed out.
She was constantly asked when she would become a mother.
That hurt her.
The people who asked don't know what's going on with me personally, medically, why I can't.
It was really hurtful.
It remains to be hoped that success and fame will also make them happy.
A disgraceful end to a career: Räikkönen has to give up
Kimi Räikkönen's departure from Formula 1 has been quieter than expected.
Abu Dhabi - The 42-year-old Finn took off his gloves and wiped sweat from his forehead.
That was it.
After a driving error and a light brush with the barriers, Räikkönen had to retire from the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix after barely half the race distance in his Alfa Romeo.
It was his 349th and final Grand Prix, the "Iceman" ending his career in the motorsport elite.
His wife Minttu and the two children also travelled to the United Arab Emirates for the farewell.
Räikkönen's greatest achievement was winning the 2007 World Championship in a Ferrari.
He won 21 Grand Prix races, started from pole 18 times and reached the podium 103 times. dpa
Friedrich wins 60th World Cup victory - Nolte wins in two-man bob - Sport
The Norwegian biathlete Ole Einar Björndalen's mark of 94 successes is the target of the bob pilot.
"I have worked it out, I would have to win nine and a half races per season, then I could make it to Cortina 2026," said the double Olympic champion from BSC Oberbärenburg, who won two victories in two days at the races in Winterberg.
He first defended against Johannes Lochner's attack on Saturday, moving from third place to first by five hundredths of a second.
Then he changed something in the set-up of the car and went out on Sunday with a 0.30 second advantage.
With his team Thorsten Margis (SV Halle), Candy Bauer (BSC Oberbärenburg) and Alexander Schüller (SV Halle), he beat the Brit Brad Hall.
Third place went to the Austrian Benjamin Maier.
"We took a bigger risk today and were rewarded for it," said Friedrich, who also reached his 22nd win in a row.
Johannes Lochner, who was driving for Stuttgart, came fifth after coming second in the previous race.
Christoph Hafer from the BC Bad Feilnbach landed in fourth place in the first race and in eighth place.
"If I knew what he was doing differently, I would do it differently," Lochner said.
Nolte with home win - podium for Jamanka
For the women, Laura Nolte won her third season victory in the two-man bob on her home track.
After finishing fourth in the monobob on the previous day, she raced to victory in the World Cup on Sunday with pusher Deborah Levi.
Olympic two-man bob champion Mariama Jamanka from the BRC Thüringen came in second place with Germany's fastest sprinter, Alexandra Burghardt from Burghausen.
She also recorded her first podium of the season in addition to qualifying for the Olympics.
The Wiesbadener Kim Kalicki landed in third place with Leonie Fiebig.
For me, it was super cool to get my first World Cup podium, I am super happy that Mariama is taking me with her.
I'm super happy with the development.
There is still a lot of potential at the start, but the start times today were okay," said Burghardt and emphasised: "It's not just about pushing, but there is a lot to do around it."
Jamanka was a little irritated by the non-perfect journeys, but said: "It's going in the right direction."
I had the blanket in my cart and could buy it now!!!
What should I do?
I did not receive it and therefore could not redeem it, which is why I finally asked.
Last year, due to Corona, I had completely different problems and never had time for it.
And now he says it's over which has made me very angry.
Look in the chat, it was about the Asare chair.
I want to return it and then order again as it's currently reduced :)
Why is delivery only starting on 16th March?
There was nothing on your website about such a long delivery time
No, only when I click on it does an extra field with the message appear
Her colleague took it away yesterday.
Why is this a problem today
I have also sent you pictures of the wrong item.
But we still want the cabinet module, just a new, undamaged one.
And not cancel the whole order.
Only this day, only this week, only until XY...
Hello dear lovely girls and women,
I have a lot of things I want to write, maybe one or the other will too...
I'm 24, have KPTBS, full-time student and dog mum - apart from the fact that my dog doesn't bark or go to nursery, he's basically my one and only child.
My friend (since 6th grade) is sick, has a 2nd degree burn on his hand from Monday, and has been depressed for years (but is now in therapy).
Yesterday I visited him because I have emotional needs too, and because I want to see and feel him, we cuddled a lot and it was nice.
I helped him with the shower (because his hand is in a cast due to burns).
He is also cold and we see each other less (1-2x a week) which is making me feel very lonely and unloved.
My puppy is currently suffering from stomach cramps, I made him some food and now he's curled up in his blanket and has calmed down a bit after I put the heat lamp and stroked him.
I live alone with my sister and my mother, and she's away for a month.
Now we also have our own homework to do, which we of course split between us.
But cooking itself is just so much work...
My PTBS illness is currently well managed, I'm about half-way through treatment, and I'm coping.
Not good, but I'm coping and I'm almost symptom free.
My university is asking for a lot (for me), tomorrow at 3pm I have a written test that I haven't prepared for and the day after tomorrow I have an anatomy class that I should at least prepare a little for.
And next week I have an oral exam on Tuesday, and what comes next is in my calendar and not in my head because there is no space left.
So my week goes: Only until tomorrow, then it's the weekend.
But after that, what happens?
Only until the birthday.
Only until the beginning of the holidays.
Only until the weekend.
Only until...
And so it goes on forever.
I think I'm just stressed out right now that I need these mental cues because otherwise I can't get it together.
Somehow I feel guilty and "chaotic," but I can't do it any other way...
Is it the same for you too?
I am infinitely grateful that I don't have to work.
I can't really put into words how grateful I am.
I don't know if I would have survived my kptbs otherwise.
I think that has a lot to do with women's mental load and that's why I thought I'd find kindred spirits here...
I wish you all a restful evening, the week is almost over!
I received my order today, unfortunately the whole other colour plus surface is scratched and the table leg has a mark.
The first delivery was the same colour as on the website.
We are very disappointed!!!!
What can you offer me?
If we change the table now, will I get another colour or what?
The cancellation email was sent on 26.12.#NUMBER#.
In fact, twice.
However, it is not confirmed.
Something completely different: I noticed at school that many religious teachers do not believe in God and for them it is just another subject like maths or geography.
For me, it was always a bit strange, maybe because I was brought up Christian and I always believed in something.
How do you feel about that?
Maybe you can also talk to colleagues at work or at school with different attitudes.
In general, I understand the difference between private and professional and it makes sense to keep them separate.
It also has a curriculum, etc.
But it would be just as strange to have a physics teacher who doesn't believe in the theory of relativity.
What then drives someone to want to teach religion if they don't believe in it?
Culture preserve or something?
I hope the question is not too personal.
Can it be changed or not? I understand English well
That's already a long time, then I would give up
That's good, thank you.
I expect to hear back soon, at the latest by the beginning of next week.
Thanks for your support #NAME#.
Please help me find a film
Hello dear people,
I'm looking for a film from my childhood (I'm 24).
I think it was a film for teenagers.
The film has two timelines (or parallel worlds).
On the one hand, the modern (real world).
On the other hand, the past (or the realm of the dead) (not quite sure).
Because I can't describe it in the real world, there is a young woman.
And in the land of the dead, a young soldier (uniform similar to those of the soldiers from the Curse of the Caribbean).
For some reason, the paths cross and a plot is created.
The antagonist is also a soldier from the Reich of the Dead who wants to take the woman to that Reich so that she can live there, I think.
I think the transition is also the soldier's grave.
In the end, I believe both soldiers are fighting against each other.
If that speaks to you, I'm grateful for every response.
Our little one has only slept on her back since week 1.
Fast forward: lives still :D
Relax.
Such a child holds out more than one thinks.
Make sure everything is in order, no cuddly toys, go in and look around, but no minute surveillance.
That would drive you crazy!
Fresh air in the room.
A good mattress.
No pillows.
Ah, and ours didn't have a sleeping bag, but always a blanket.
Watch your child when they sleep.
Does it turn the head to one side?
Can it be turned around from the inside?
Or is it with the face facing up directly on the mattress?
This tells you whether everything is in order.
We've all grown up and when my husband was born, it was just normal to put the kids to bed on their backs.
In addition, we are already "regular customers" with you and have already bought many articles
But why are you only offering me 20EUR?
Hello, I wrote to one of your colleagues yesterday and have not received a reply so far.
It's about my wardrobe that arrived yesterday (order number: #ALPHANUMERIC-ID#).
The right drawer doesn't fit in the cupboard.
I would like to contact you as soon as possible.
The cabinet is currently not in use.
To put it simply.
RBTV has promised a lot.
And yes, I know that not everything can be kept.
And I had a lot of fun with RBTV.
It's just that the politics of this broadcaster are now under a cloud.
Almost every format is sponsored (ok), but then go on a big begging tour at the same time.
It was said that it was an "independent" internet broadcaster.
Arno quotes: "We don't want to be a running water column."
What are we now?
An 0815 advert trying to get his BilloMerch to the elite fan.
And then we have Marah's do's and don'ts.
Naturally, they apply to everyone, except Simon and Etienne.
Of course, people can continue to offend.
A Krogmann who is completely lacking in empathy and is trying to make a profit from the action by renting the exploded rooms at a premium.
How can one find all of this good?
Terrible if you like it, I find it dreadful.
I request a recall as my delivered wooden table is defective.
A breakdown of the #PRS_ORG# due to damaged delivery.
Whether as a comforter for stomach ache or simply for cuddling - my little heat-loving friend is versatile.
Cherry-seed cushions are a traditional home remedy for soothing heat applications, as cherry seeds absorb heat very well and can be released in a controlled manner.
The removable inner cushion is very easy to warm up in the microwave or in the oven.
The soft touch makes the application particularly pleasant, so that even if the little ones are not feeling well, they feel safe.
The cherry seed cushion with a cover is only suitable for the following applications:
Before warming up the kissens on an unusual smell, check for stock or burn marks and remove them immediately if present.
Please remove the inner cushion from the cover before warming it up!
In the microwave at max. 300 watts for max. 2 minutes (microwave manufacturer's instructions to be followed!)
Immediately after heating, the heat is distributed evenly throughout the blanket by shaking!
Then, place the inner cushion back into the cover.
At first heating, there can be a slight moisture build-up on the surface, but this disappears with repeated applications.
Be sure to adhere to the specified warming instructions, as longer periods or higher energy outputs can lead to damage (ignition and fire hazard!).
Before heating the kisses in the microwave, check the manufacturer's instructions for permission to heat grain products.
After the heated inner cushion has been put back into the cover, please check the temperature of the cushion for babies (max. 43°C) on your arm!
Do not use the pillow for acute and chronic inflammatory or feverish conditions, circulatory problems, fresh haemorrhages, bleeding and open wounds, or for people with reduced pain sensitivity.
If you have existing skin, heart, vein, diabetes or tumour conditions, or are pregnant, please consult a doctor before use.
If seams have opened and loose kernels are coming out, dispose of the product and loose kernels immediately and out of reach of children.
If the product is applied to babies under 1 year of age, the temperature of the baby should be monitored regularly during application to avoid overheating!
All serious incidents related to the product should be reported to the manufacturer and the competent authority of the country in which the user is registered.
The cover is removable and washable at 30°C in the machine.
Please note the care symbols on the product!
Darmstadt second after Hinserie - Pauli wins in Düsseldorf
Darmstadt 98 can dream of returning to the Bundesliga.
Meanwhile, Hannover 96 are working their way out of the relegation zone.
Ingolstadt is also not doing well under the third coach.
Jubilation in Darmstadt after the late victory in the top match, joy in Hanover over interim coach Christoph Dabrowski and frustration in Ingolstadt after the unsuccessful start under new coach Rüdiger Rehm.
Is the battery dead?
Last night my laptop (ThinkPad E480 20KQ and about 3 years old) stopped charging through my power supply.
I bought this about 5 months ago, so it should still work.
I thought that a power supply alone would be enough to run it.
Uh oh, the battery is dead and the laptop won't start despite the power supply being plugged in.
I then removed the battery, but nothing happens.
Maybe you have ideas?
A new battery has been ordered, but why can't I use my laptop while it's plugged in?
Is there anything else broken?
Many thanks for your help!
I would like the delivery of the #PRS_ORG# to be brought to my room.
How can I book it?
I'm interested in the #PRS_ORG# chair.
But we don't know how high the seat is...
Often on tour and yet still have a lot of equipment with you?
No problem with the Everyday V2 Backpack from Peak Design.
The 20 litre capacity swallows larger camera kit without a problem, and can be safely stowed using the padded FlexFold dividers.
And what you need for everyday items is well organised and separable from the photo equipment in the individually configurable interior thanks to practical access.
The "update" of the Everyday Line to version 2 (V2) also presents the series in a new look.
Its sleek, minimalist design has become a bit of a cliché - with the Everyday Backpack series, Peak Design has developed some highly innovative solutions that reliably protect the interior of the backpack, while at the same time allowing quick access to photo equipment.
It works in two ways: first, conventionally, through the hinged flap that can be closed with the MagLatch locking system, a superbly thought-out solution for effective protection that has already proved its worth in Messenger Bags.
The closure has a metal hook with a matching anchor bar on the front of the rucksack.
Unlike most backpacks, Peak Design has thought of different "fill levels": there are four anchor bars, riveted in place, into which the closure hooks can be inserted.
If the rucksack is full, you simply take the top beam, if it is rather empty, you take a deeper one.
The catch and hook are also magnetic.
This way, the rucksack can also be reliably closed without the hook getting stuck.
The second option differentiates the Everyday Backpack fundamentally from other camera backpacks: In addition to the flap, there is also a zipper opening on both sides of the backpack.
This eliminates the biggest drawback of conventional backpacks with top access - you don't have to rummage through the contents!
At the same time, this clever detail increases the everyday usability of the rucksack enormously: If you don't just take your photo equipment, but also everyday items or travel gear.
In the Everyday Backpack, you can configure the interior space individually (more on that below) and thus store both items separately and independently of each other - and through the two side openings, you can also access them independently.
You can also pull the rucksack from the right side to get to the camera equipment in the right main compartment, while the everyday items stay safely in the left side of the rucksack and don't get in the way.
Comfortable, easily adjustable straps help.
And because the rucksack's outer shell is also made from 100% recycled, waterproof nylon, the contents will stay dry even if you're heading to Scotland in the autumn.
Unfortunately, I'm waiting in vain for the email from their support.
#NAME# sent me an email yesterday confirming the appointment
The delivery company has announced that contact has been made to collect the wrongly delivered table.
So far, I haven't received any news.
I request immediate action.
I am now writing to the third support employee, none of whom have got me any further than a promise that I will receive an email confirmation.
It is about the return of the incorrectly delivered custom #NAME#
When can we expect the wardrobe to be delivered again?
I don't think it's an option to keep him at that level...
It works.
Many thanks for the help
Wishing you a good evening
Hello, my order number is #NUMBER#. When will the article be delivered?
The order and payment were on 12.1.21.
I was sent a completely different lamp to the one I ordered
Please call me
If you extend the voucher, then I will place a larger order immediately, but at least I have kept the damaged piece of furniture and not sent it back.
And that the previous year went differently than expected I couldn't have anticipated and I haven't been able to resolve and clarify it in a timely manner.
But the damage I as a customer cannot accept.
Rotinger brake discs are designed to meet the demands of the dynamic driver, who appreciates the reliability and safety of braking even in difficult conditions.
Rotinger brake discs are made from cast iron and are then mechanically worked (drilled and cut).
All ground glass is made in short series according to individual technical properties, which are specific for certain plates and patterns.
On the basis of the individual technical drawing, a special production programme is created, which is geared to the balancing of the disk according to the properties of the original mounting.
The tinted glass produced in this way ensures high comfort and braking efficiency.
Additional openings increase the effectiveness of the cooling of the disc, with the slots improving the cleaning of the brake discs and pads.
The aesthetic properties of our painted glass underline the attractive and eye-catching appearance of every car.
Coloma is the town where an unexpected event shaped the history of the West Coast.
In the winter of 1848, a man discovered glowing rocks in the water at the southern fork of the American River.
Though he tried to keep his discovery secret, the news spread quickly and set off the so-called "California Gold Rush" of 1849.
Thousands came from near and far to make Coloma one of the fastest-growing and most prosperous cities in the country.
Areas were cordoned off, tents were pitched and saloons and hotels sprang up almost overnight.
Everyone wanted to share in the wealth of the country.
For many it was "Coloma or Bust" (Coloma or Bankruptcy)!
In this game you are a pioneer seeking wealth in the West and looking to make a name for yourself.
You will be looking for gold, recruiting workers, rounding up horses and building businesses.
You will also have the opportunity to explore the surrounding riverbanks and adjoining areas.
You're not alone - the other pioneers seem to have the same idea!
You have to outdo your peers to avoid going bust like the rest of them.
Coloma is a fast-paced strategy game with many paths to victory.
You choose your actions simultaneously, must manage your resources and build a tableau that works more and more for you (so-called "engine building").
The buildings on your tableau allow you to be more efficient, get additional actions, or bend the rules in your favor.
With these buildings and dynamic bridge tiles, you can develop your individual playing style with fine adjustments.
Coloma played out over a period of three years from 1848 (the year gold was discovered at Coloma), through 1849 (the year of the California Gold Rush) to 1850 (the year California became a state).
A year in Coloma consists of five rounds.
During each round, players secretly and simultaneously choose a location on the board where they can perform actions.
Then, their choices are revealed and they place their pioneers in the appropriate locations.
If a location has the most pioneers, it gets a lock!
This deactivates half of the site - reducing the possible actions that can be taken there.
Players then take turns performing actions such as gathering resources, moving wagons, setting up tents, exploring rivers, building bridges, opening shops, and positioning revolver heroes.
When all the actions are completed, the pioneers return.
The auctioneer rotates to a new location at the beginning of each round, changing the available actions.
This goes on until the caller has moved five times, covering each location once, and the year ends.
There is a shootout in which the players must defend Coloma from a band of angry bandits.
If the players have contributed enough revolver men and are numerically superior to the bandit, they will receive rewards.
But if they fail, they receive lesser rewards or end up in the graveyard.
The game ends after the third shooting range, then the final ranking is determined.
The player with the most victory points wins!
For free shipping, I take up to 35 x 25 x 4.5 cm as the shipping method, parcel post (games folded).
DPD is usually insured and sent with tracking (in a single sheet, wrapped in cellophane and with packing paper).
If you are a collector, I can send cartons in cartons for a surcharge of 2 euros, which will arrive at 100% free of print marks.
"Why children are not tyrants" documentary, ARD Mediathek
CW psychological violence, sexual abuse, abuse of power
The ARD documentary has now appeared in my Twitter timeline, and I have watched it.
Child psychiatrist Michael Winterhoff is a frequent guest on talk shows and gives lectures all over Europe.
With his book "Why Our Children Become Tyrants" (2008), he sparked a heated debate about parenting.
Former patients and guardians are now making serious accusations against him.
Please be careful, the film is hard to watch.
And I am very grateful that many people now think and act differently.
Parents and other responsible adults should never, never, never, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever,
Our goal must always be to give the child the freedom to develop and to make the framework for the child as large as possible, given the situation.
Brrr, it still chills me.
Holetschek: Countries advise on scrapping test requirement for triple-vaccinated
The health ministers of the Länder will decide at their next meeting whether to scrap the test requirement for triple-vaccinated people.
"We need to get clarity quickly as to whether and when the test requirement for those who have been vaccinated can be dropped," said Klaus Holetschek (CSU), chairman of the conference of health ministers, to "Bild am Sonntag".
The loss of 2G plus for triple-vaccinated people is "not only medically justified, but also provides an additional vaccination incentive," said Holetschek.
Federal Health Minister Karl Lauterbach (SPD) has promised that "he will already make a proposal to the health ministers' conference next Tuesday". - afp
So I want to send the lamp back
How should I go about this?
Hello, I find the #PRS_ORG# chair very nice, but I can't see how high the seat is.
Can you help me further?
I can no longer shop through my #PRS_ORG.
Ad: Oops, there was an error.
Shopping online through the #PRS_ORG# page on a computer.
I have updated my account information.
What is the reason for this?
What you describe is called *awareness* - i.e. sensory awareness under general anaesthesia.
They occur with a frequency of about 1 in 1000.
The most common is hearing sounds/voices, less frequently seeing pictures and the least frequently feeling pain.
Relevant for this topic: Caesarean sections are operations that go hand in hand with an increased rate of awareness, since in order to protect the child until the umbilical cord is cut, a very deep anaesthetic is avoided.
Any previous episodes of awareness should be mentioned at the pre-anaesthetic discussion.
Certain anesthetic procedures, such as total intravenous anesthesia (TIVA), are associated with a slightly increased risk.
**EDIT: Love you all, this comment of mine describes awareness correctly, however** u/Nitemarex **did not.
I misread her comment.
However, the chair is defective.
Unfortunately, the 20 euros are no help to us.
These are statutory warranty claims.
The absolute minimum would be that they take the defective chair back.
This is in addition to the legal obligation, and is standard practice in the area of eCommerce.
Please check again if they at least take the broken chair back.
We then sell the second chair privately.
We will also lose a lot of money.
I have already sent you an email that you have not responded to.
Again the question.
The order and the invoice state that the goods will be delivered to a room of my choice.
The courier is company #NAME#.
I just called there.
They told me they only deliver to the front door - because of #PRS_ORG#.
Is that so?
If so, I'll have to cancel the order as I don't know anyone who can carry the heavy furniture upstairs.
Will I not be called?
I had a question
Theater historian Günther Rühle dies at the age of 97
He has made a name for himself as a theatre critic and as an artistic director.
Later he wrote a monumental theatre history.
On Friday, Günther Rühle, aged 97, died.
There is still the new book on the table, freshly printed: "An old man gets older."
An unsettling diary of a slow goodbye to the world kept by the theatre historian and journalist Günther Rühle until April 2021.
And in the middle of reading, the news comes that the author has died.
The last sentence in the book reads: "I am here to testify to my life's worth."
There are different types of pallets.
One of the most common are Europallets, standard wooden pallets, which are mainly used as cargo carriers in the European region.
They are certified by the European Pallet Association (EPAL)
According to data from Statistics Austria, over 10 million pallets were produced in Austria in 2020.
The production value was around 79 million euros.
How many pallets are imported into Austria each year is not collected
New York clinches first MLS title
New York City FC has won the Major League Soccer title for the first time.
After a 1-1 draw in regular time against the host Portland Timbers, the Eastern Conference team won the final in a penalty shootout 4-2.
In the Eastern Conference final, New York beat Philadelphia Union, the team of German Kai Wagner.
Rouladen tips & tricks
I had many great tips for the perfect goulash a week ago.
That was at Christmas and it was unbelievably delicious and buttery!
So thanks again :)
Now I've got the taste for it and I want to cook rouladen for the first time for New Year's Eve.
Tomorrow I will set up a beef fund.
Do you have any other tips for me?
Note: I don't have an oven, just a big pot.
What's next?
What happened to the books or how do I get them back on my #PRS_ORG#?
My English is not as good as it used to be, but I'll get there
It's about a refund of €#NUMBER#.
I was informed by email on 18 January that the refund had been processed.
However, to this day, the money has not been credited to my account.
Please check that.
Where there is still Christmas roast in the Lübeck region
For many people, goose or duck are part of Christmas like the Christmas tree and presents.
Have you not yet bought any chickens?
Now time is running out.
We will tell you where you can still get a Christmas roast in Lübeck.
The "drive" of a tube output stage is a major contributor to the heat and fatness of a guitar amplifier sound.
These features are perfectly implemented by the Valve Reactor circuit.
With the VOLUME, GAIN and MASTER VOLUME controls, you can set the desired level and the stereo balance of your sounds.
In addition, the VT+ series amplifiers offer a unique POWER LEVEL control that allows you to reduce the volume without changing the "Gain" or distortion.
Further up, it was already clear that the POWER LEVEL regulator can even float a performance reserve if it gets too loud.
Thanks to the POWER LEVEL regulator, the full potential of the VT+ series can be used in any situation.
The headphone jack can also be used as a line out.
The signal here is processed with a box simulation, so that you get an eminently "acoustic" sound impression even when using headphones or direct recordings.
An AUX jack can be connected to a CD or MP3 player so you can listen to your favourite tunes.
There is also a tuner function on board - you don't need a separate tuner.
If you also invest in a VFS5 footswitch, you can call up the sounds comfortably using your foot, switch the effect blocks on and off, and adjust the tempo of the compatible effects "tapping".
This is actually essential for live operations.
With its new power packages, VOX is taking another step into the future!
But others saw it differently.
Then there is the possibility to send the lamp back?
Because they're too low for a table?
So I would like to send them back.
Can you help me with that?
And the wardrobe?
Will we get another update on the exact delivery date in the next few weeks?
Hello, have they already sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
If it doesn't work out, I'd be happy with a refund or a voucher.
In some cases, I may find a buyer for the furniture.
Over 1,000 euros for goods I don't need is a bit much.
I have just received my delivery and would like to know if screws were included as part of the delivery.
I would like to mount the #PRS_ORG# Spiegel (mirror) on the designated hook.
That's not a satisfactory answer and the wait has not been worth it
Do you have a premium customer status?
Iran sees progress in nuclear talks
According to Iranian reports, progress is being made in the negotiations to revive the international nuclear agreement.
"Both sides are close to reaching an agreement on the agenda items that should be on the agenda," said Iran's chief negotiator Ali Bagheri on Sunday to the state-run IRNA news agency.
This is a "positive and important development," he said, because at first there was not even agreement on what to negotiate.
The agreement is intended to prevent Iran from building nuclear weapons.
On Thursday, the Vienna talks to revive the agreement resumed after a one-week break.
Negotiators from Iran, Germany, Great Britain, China, France and Russia are taking part in the talks.
A US delegation is also present in Vienna, but is only indirectly involved in the negotiations.
Thuringia overtakes Saxony - Thuringia is now a federal state with the highest corona incidence
Thuringia has replaced Saxony and currently has the highest incidence rate in the country.
It is the only federal state where the value is above 1000.
Thuringia was the only federal state to exceed the 1,000 mark in the corona incidence on Sunday.
The Robert Koch Institute reported a seven-day value of 1,025 new infections per 100,000 residents.
In Saxony, which has always shown the highest incidence rate nationwide, this figure stood at 990.5 on Sunday.
On Friday and Saturday, the incidence in Thuringia was slightly lower, but was still above the value of 1000.
In Thuringia, 2242 new infections with the Sars-CoV-2 virus and 16 further deaths in connection with an infection were reported within one day.
On Sunday, 200 seriously ill people with Covid-19 were treated in intensive care units in hospitals.
On weekends, there can be delays in registration.
In addition, the health authorities have been overwhelmed for weeks and are hardly able to keep up with the recording of new cases.
I understand that.
As the delivery won't take place until early March, it may be possible until then.
I have to print it and stick it on the package and take it to the post office, right?
Here I don't have to click/enter/fill anything else?
I don't want to do that, so I'm writing to you.
I would like to take responsibility for the return at my own cost.
I think the €8 return fee is a cheek.
It's time for change
###The German Bundestag has greeted me, I am in the plenary hall in the heart of Europe on a fantastic day!
Why is the post here?
If one looks at the activity in the past months of the Bundestag one can see that it is not existing.
We've fallen into a winter rut and have extended the summer drought for a few months.
#Where is the problem?
Yes, what was the reason?
For the most part, that's just down to dissatisfaction with how things have been going and how we generally present ourselves.
Over the last few days, it has become increasingly apparent that many here are still very keen on the Bundestag.
What we need to change
At this point, the community around the Bundestag is asking which of these it wants to keep alive.
The impetus came from u/edizVEVO, who has been paying attention to this project in the last few days and found, simply put, a mess.
After some back-and-forth, several people from the community have expressed interest in reviving the project.
However, I would like to call on everyone again to participate, so that this project can continue to exist in the future.
We have created a discussion platform in the form of a Discord server, where we can exchange ideas and work on concrete things.
You can join the server via this link.
Goals:
* How should the Bundestag work in the future?
* What existing orders need to be changed/amended/removed?
* How should we present ourselves in the future to the outside world?
* How will new members be recruited?
* How can we create a fair election system?
I'm pretty sure I forgot something, but that's not a big deal, we'll discuss it on Discord in the end.
If you have the time and the interest, come to the Discord, work with us, and let's democratically decide the future.
I have ordered a lampshade from you that is still to be delivered.
Now I see that the article is too big/clumsy for my taste.
For that, I have already ordered a different suspension for you.
I put it together and noticed it when I took the soft foam.
Very sad about that.
I hope it is returned and I get a full refund.
This is also pretty sad, as #NAME# is much darker than expected.
I have one question: the daily cover #PRS_ORG# is also available in oversize, for example in 240/240?
#PRS_ORG# must guarantee that the faulty wardrobe is collected as soon as possible.
And I ask you to do this now.
I don't have a suitable box, but I will remove the shelf as far as possible for collection - they will need to contact #PRS_ORG# to discuss how this can be done.
#PRS_ORG# can be contacted at any time to arrange a collection.
Is there an instruction manual for the installation?
How long would I have to wait to get this sorted or decide whether to send it back?
How do you answer the question why you are vegan?
Today I had a conversation with a colleague that I like very much.
She herself has lived as a vegetarian for a while, and currently eats meat only very rarely.
I was a vegetarian for several years before that.
When asked if I had always wanted to be vegan and vegetarian a planned stepping stone, I answered honestly without much thought.
And that I had long thought that as a vegetarian I was supporting animal welfare, but at some point I reflected and understood that in doing so I was ultimately supporting animal cruelty.
That's why I decided to become vegan.
At that moment I got the impression that discontent was growing on their side, and then she defended vegetarianism and said she knew where her meat came from and that as a vegetarian she reduced animal suffering.
Now I wonder if my answer to "plump" was too blunt?
How do they answer the question?
I feel like as a vegan I'm quickly put in a corner and conflicts arise without me wanting to.
It greets a harmony-loving vegan (;
It is not an exception under § 312d BGB.
Their #PRS_ORG# do not exempt them from the legal requirements for online sales.
I am not available on the date assigned by #PRS_ORG# to collect my return in person.
As I cannot be there in person for a funeral, that cannot be changed.
Can I please be given an alternative collection time?
From 01.02.#NUMBER# I will be back again.
Lahnsteiner rescue for water rescue: 45,000 euro grant from the state
Recently, the Rhineland-Palatinate Minister of the Interior, Roger Lewentz, presented a grant decision in the amount of 45,000 euros for the new water rescue vehicle for the volunteer fire department of Lahnstein to the Oberbürgermeister, Peter Labonte.
The total cost of the vehicle, which has been in use since November 2020, was €135,000.
A good and important investment in security.
I am delighted that the state of Rhineland-Palatinate is supporting us in this," says Lahnstein's mayor Peter Labonte.
The equipment van is used by the Lahnstein diving team, one of a total of seven units in Rhineland-Palatinate.
They perform tasks above and below water in water rescue and technical assistance.
In Lahnstein, they are permanently expecting an increase in deployments: the boom in the hotel shipping on the Rhine and Mosel, as well as the further increasing use of the Lahn as a leisure river, contribute to this.
I bought a book that I could only read 10% of and then the problems started.
I can't open the book.
However, following their recommendations, I synced, removed and reloaded the app NOTHING has worked.
I am a little frustrated because the whole thing has taken so much time and I am hoping for help now.
Okay, then.
I would like to order 3 articles from the #PRS_ORG# collection for June.
Can I enter a date during the ordering process?
According to the ANSI/PLATO FL1 standard, the aforementioned values were measured in the Fenix laboratory at 21°C±3°C, 50%-80% relative humidity and with the built-in 275mAh LiPo battery.
The values can vary depending on the type of flashlight used, age and environment.
*: The burn duration in the Hell stage contains the burn duration with reduced brightness due to the overheating protection.
2) Dealers are responsible for customers.
Customers should contact the retailers or distributors where they purchased Fenix lights for warranty support using the Fenixlight Limited 'warranty card' and either an invoice or receipt.
Fenix will provide our authorized retailers with the technology and parts necessary to maintain our lights.
1) 15-day free replacement: Fenix will replace a new product within 15 days of purchase if a manufacturing defect occurs within normal use.
We will replace it with the same model.
When the model is discontinued, customers get a product with a similar or improved model.
2) Free repairs for 5 years: Fenix offers free repairs for 5 years from the date of purchase if a problem occurs due to normal use.
Different warranty periods for different products:
In addition to the above-mentioned products and accessories, other products or free offers from Fenix are not covered by the product guarantee.
3) Limited lifetime warranty: For lights that have exceeded the free repair period, we offer lifetime repairs, but charge for parts.
The trader tells the customer the cost of the part before the repair.
4) Guarantee certificate: Customers demand customer service from Fenix retailers or dealers by presenting a completed Fenix guarantee card, a purchase receipt or a receipt.
The distributor should offer services to customers and Fenix will support those services.
5) The free warranty does not cover damages or failures caused by:
Any defects or damages caused by improper use, including but not limited to, the operation that does not comply with the guarantee or the instructions in the product specification.
For example, the product specification describes that the sealed head must not be dismantled, as this can damage the torch and make the guarantee invalid.
Any defects or damages caused by other behaviors cannot be properly controlled by Fenix.
6) To make a claim under the guarantee, please contact our guarantee department with the following information: Name, type/model of the guarantee object, serial number.
Thanks for standing up for this, I've also spent nearly a decade in the civil service in a similar role, so we were both carrying guns in the executive, I won't go into that any further!
The question of right and left always seems very simplified to me.
In principle, however, one should say that the civil servant is more likely to come from the liberal to conservative spectrum and not from the revolutionary left, which should be clear to everyone.
Of course, it should also be clear to everyone that people in uniform and carrying weapons should also be attracted to the conservative magic of the right, and of course it is also clear that these people then have difficulty with the lived reality, because alongside the average white person, there are now many Germans with a migrant background, women and also homosexuals (and by that I don't mean the exaggerated feminine queer cliché, because they are few and far between in the executive, but rather normal men and women who you wouldn't notice were gay if they didn't tell you, and on these people I have to rely, because in the event, they will save your life or set this up for you).
But even these fringe groups, in my experience, represent a conservative attitude, i.e. they are proud of Germany and feel more distanced from Germany by over-the-top left-wing policies, even if these policies are meant to help them or seem to do so. They just want to be treated normally.
Coming back to the rights, of course, the police and the armed forces are also a cross-section of society, so one will also find extreme right-wingers there, but the fact that they are allowed to openly voice their opinion there or even openly hatch any state-threatening plans is completely exaggerated by the media and annoys me.
Of course, it is understandable that police officers and soldiers, who have often been deployed abroad, often start to generalise and even say things that are controversial or politically incorrect.
It also happens that certain like-minded people meet and engage in lively debate.
Nevertheless, such things are well fought against and also countered with political education and enlightenment!
Germany is so very international and that is also good in my opinion that we cannot afford to have real racists and Nazis in our ranks!
Yes, what I don't understand is that I also ordered the other basket on the German side.
Why should this come from England?
When I ordered, it wasn't sold out.
I ordered it back in November.
But it was confirmed to me in your confirmation of the order
It's still about my order, which is no longer available.
I've chatted with #NAME# before.
Alternatively, the other #PRS_ORG# basket for #NUMBER# euros in black could also be delivered to Germany, or this basket is also available in Germany.
I always see you as a partner company.
But on the edge of the wood there are two deep grooves filled with something yellow
and there is a small scratch on the mirror itself
Ordinary through child?
Hello, I have been dealing with a problem for a long time.
I'm very disciplined and organised at work (I'm self-employed, very little free time), but for as long as I can remember I've struggled to keep my household clean and tidy.
There are always phases where nothing happens, and then and now I pack up and clean.
But it's really not like "someone might just drop in for a visit."
Unfortunately, my husband is (unfortunately) no better, it bothers me somewhere, but mostly the household simply loses out to work and laziness.
The kitchen is cleaned most regularly as we like to cook there.
Now to my question, have you managed to become more orderly with children?
We haven't done one yet, but we are working on it and this question has been on my mind for a while.
Because for me, I have no motivation to do it, it just doesn't bother me so much as long as no one comes to visit and for example there are always new clothes and the kitchen is usable.
If you have a child, do you push them harder or do you slack off?
I look forward to hearing from you.
Exclusive, new and high-quality, anatomically pre-formed cut offers maximum comfort, perfect fit and so almost unrestricted freedom of movement.
Pre-moulding with a special further shaping at the joints for improved freedom of movement (arm and knee joints)
For the Focea Comfort 4, the area covered by the Flex System 2 was more than doubled to further increase comfort.
Seamless stretch panels on the joints reduce friction (shoulder, arm and knee bends)
High-quality pre-forms in the lower back and in the step ensure a snug, perfect fit.
Elaskin 8.8 Stretch Panel in the lumbar region increases flexibility around the back zipper and improves comfort, especially when bending and when mounting and deploying equipment on the surface.
The Free Flex Zone, which is located around the shoulders and back, provides increased flexibility in the movement of the arms and back.
Fireskin is a warm, water-repellent material with a special surface structure that offers a high degree of cold protection.
Placed on the chest, it delivers heat to a sensitive area of the body.
Seamless, thin (-2 mm) sealing around the face on the cap increases comfort, sealing and durability (separate cap)
A soft, collar-like zone improves sealing with a fine-adjustable width adjustment by a flexible, gentle-on-the-skin press stud that doesn't stick to the casing or seams
Double-zippered wrist and ankle cuffs connect a replaceable inner cuff with a soft, neoprene outer cuff
45° bend at the end of the inner cuff for increased elasticity and load-bearing when pulling on it.
Long zip at the nape with an Elaskin reinforcement for an anatomical cut with increased comfort on the overall without a hood
Langer G-Lock P Backplate (Overall without hood) with metal cam and integrated Water Dam System for improved watertightness (Beuchat Patent)
Velcro fasteners on arms and legs
Neoprene reinforcements at both ends of the fasteners to prevent tearing should excessive force be applied.
Neoprene panels bonded together with external and internal overlaps
The edges of the outer straps are reinforced for greater load-bearing capacity
Seams on the inside of the belts for increased flexibility
The original Beuchat system was designed to fix the computer in place, especially for deeper dives (the system is compatible with all popular wrist computers)
Career in social work - as someone with a personality disorder?
I did an apprenticeship in the field of software development and have been learning for about a year now.
Unfortunately, I am noticing more and more that this job is not the right one for me, which is why I have been thinking about starting afresh and studying social work for some time now.
The problem: I have an avoidant personality disorder (AVPD).
This means in a nutshell that I have no self-esteem and am therefore shy.
I have no problem talking to people at a factual level, but it's very hard for me to strike up a conversation and I've been told many times that I come across as unapproachable (which I think I'm getting better at).
Can I become a social worker?
I don't want to work as a street worker or in an open youth centre, but rather in, for example, addiction counselling or family support.
But I don't know if the actual working day is really like I imagine it to be, and it's difficult to find anything online about it.
The ÄVPS is already causing me problems in my job (for me, emotionally), because it always brings me down when there's something wrong with my code ("again, it's just the simplest things") and it's hard for me to ask more experienced colleagues for help ("I should really know how that works"/"I'm holding up my colleagues with my silly questions about the job"/"he must really think I'm incompetent" etc.).
I will probably have problems like this in every job, but I wanted to mention it here.
But have you got your sofa back?
There was no confirmation for that either.
I'm waiting for a collection date
What do they mean by return please!
If I download a book from the #PRS_ORG#, I get the message "Your #PRS_ORG# does not authorize this book"
Are there problems?
I was chatting to #PRS_ORG# who asked if I had received a delivery confirmation for my wardrobe.
The protein in the bird's food is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into individual protein building blocks (amino acids) and the bird then uses these to build its own body proteins, which it needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in the nestling and the feather renewal in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are particularly demanding for the whole organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio should not be administered during breeding, as it can cause disruptions in the breeding cycle.
Following this regular intake of NEKTON-Bio, we should return to a daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement).
The protein in the bird's food is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into individual protein building blocks (amino acids), which the bird then uses to build its own body proteins, which it needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in the nestling and the feather renewal in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are particularly demanding for the whole organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio is not to be administered during breeding, as it can cause disruptions in the breeding cycle.
Following this regular intake of NEKTON-Bio, we should return to a daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement).
1 g NEKTON Bio in 250 ml water or 100 g soft food.
It is only necessary to prepare as much drinking water/soft food as the bird consumes on a daily basis and to change the water/food daily.
A scraped measuring spoon (lying down) corresponds to 1 g NEKTON Bio.
In the case of severe feather damage, the double or triple dose of NEKTON-Bio can be given initially, until the onset of feather regrowth is visible.
Thereafter, the normal dose is administered until the feather regrowth is complete.
Storage: NEKTON-Bio should be stored dry, out of direct sunlight, between 15° and 25°C.
Please forgive us, but the chair is being sold as an office chair.
How can an office chair break after 9 months?
The warranty period in Germany is 24 months.
That's really bad service.
Hello, I sent an email on Monday to let you know that my order was damaged and pictures were added.
Have you received this email?
A statement from a church employee in opposition to the bylaws
Hello r/LegaladviceGerman,
I have a problem.
A walnut tree is to be felled on our plot.
So a planning application has been submitted to the municipality.
An employee writes to me that the felling of fruit trees and thus the walnut tree is not part of the bylaws.
However, the walnut tree is explicitly listed as a protected tree in the bylaws.
Can I now rely on the statement of the employee or not?
On the one hand, I have to rely on expert opinion.
On the other hand, the statute is clear.
Thank you for your answers
We understand that.
Then we will use the new packaging for that.
I did not receive a message
Well, then I still have a sofo without use.
Could you offer me a legacy or a voucher?
What was more expensive?
Yes, I think so, but the question is whether I can pay in euros and have the blanket delivered to Germany
Can you check that?
Urgent report: Serious road accident in Selb
Recently, a serious traffic accident occurred on the St 2179 between the junction Selb-Nord and Plößberg.
As the police press release currently reports (14:03), a car came into the oncoming traffic while overtaking.
There are injuries.
Ah okay, I understand.
Well, then many thanks again for making it so easy!
Advice and ideas for further professional life
Merry Christmas to you!
Unfortunately, my Christmas is not very good because my dear head is just thinking of everything that can be thought of.
Before I open up here now ... in short: I need advice and preferably from people who know my situation - that is, you.
I'm doing the refereeing as a rookie.
Originally I studied something else and worked in a related area (to remain somewhat anonymous, I won't go into specifics here).
But then it became too boring for me and I looked for alternatives that would be more fun.
At some point I landed in teaching and was sure that was it - even if the conditions were much less flexible than in my previous job, but that didn't matter to me.
I'm now at the third "I Google other job postings".
And it's only been a half a year.
Before the fights I have always decided to go on and at least finish the round, after that I can always change my mind.
But I am absolutely finished.
I had so little free time last month that I was completely exhausted.
The holidays are here, but there's still a lot of work waiting for me.
Before the referee I always thought I was stress-resistant, but my weekend was also my weekend and my evening was also my evening.
That was when I was free.
And the stress at work was irrelevant in those moments.
Now, even the family celebration is too much stress for me.
And then there are these rigid structures that further irritate me.
In general it's fun and from the outside it's running well, which is the feedback and so on.
But I'm completely exhausted and wonder how much stress my body can take before it completely shuts down - if it isn't already.
I wonder if I want to have the rest of my working life like this - especially when I read some of your contributions - or if I should go back to the old area, where I was valued, could take my free time when I needed it, found the work a bit boring but was paid appropriately and was part of a team, rather than being a lone fighter as most of the time is now.
But then I wonder if I won't be back at the same place in a year and be dissatisfied.
You realise it's all a bit of a mess, but maybe as an outsider you have advice or ideas on how I can get out of this situation, where I start crying at the mere thought of it.
I'm not making decisions right now that are based on emotion, and I don't think that's going to lead to anything good.
But maybe your views will help me to see at least a little light at the end of the tunnel - or to enjoy Christmas, which is enough for me for now.
Thanks for reading and sorry for the whiny tone.
I hope my situation is at least a little clearer now.
Since its introduction in 2001, the Valvetronix series from VOX has continued to evolve, which has led to the combination of cutting-edge modelling technology with the "Valve Reactor" circuit, which perfectly emulates the behaviour of a valve amplifier.
With the VT20X/VT40X/VT100X amps, we are introducing a brand new modelling engine that is completely up to date in terms of sound.
Thanks to the VET technology (Virtual Element Technology), which is based on the analysis of the components and amplifier circuits, the VTX amplifiers are equipped with an authenticity that is absolutely impressive.
These amps also contain the multi-stage Valvetronix tube preamp.
This is partly based on genuine analogue circuitry, because these are better at capturing the sound variations and nuances of a valve amplifier than any simulation.
In addition to this sophisticated circuit, the VTX amplifiers offer a closed housing and a bass reflex system that lets the natural resonances simply bubble forth.
With the VOX Tone Room software, you can even correct and bend historical facts on the virtual level, so that the amp and effects sound just like you've always imagined.
The perfect combination of tube sound with modelling technology is primarily due to the 2001 introduction of the VOX Valve Reactor technology.
Naturally, it has been refined since then to meet new sound demands, leading to another performance boost for the VOX Valvetronix series in 2010 - with more dynamics and a host of significantly improved amplifier models.
The new VT+ Valvetronix series, from the handy VT20+ to the VT120+ with two speakers, has been designed in such a way that all guitarists looking for maximum sound variety will find what they are looking for here.
All guitarists dream of the pressure and dynamics of a tube amp: they expect a fat sound, a nuanced reproduction of playing dynamics and string attack, and a quick response.
During a detailed analysis, VOX engineers discovered that the final stage determines the tube character of an amplifier and developed the VOX Valve Reactor technology based on this discovery.
The valve reactor circuit of any VT+ amplifier with a 12AX7 tube forms the behaviour, the subtle nuances and the sound character of a valve amplifier perfectly.
NBA: Despite 20 points from Wagner, Magic lose to Clippers
The Orlando Magic's losing streak in the NBA continues.
The Wagner brothers can shine - but it's not enough to beat the Los Angeles Clippers.
Despite 20 points from Franz Wagner and seven points from his older brother Moritz, the Magic fell 104-106 to the Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday.
The main feature is also adaptable: with three individually adjustable and foldable Velcro fastening parts, it is tailored to suit the needs of your photographic equipment and is therefore suitable for all types of cameras - from compact system cameras of all sizes to full-format reflex cameras.
What actually fits in the rucksack, of course, depends on the size of the camera and the lenses.
A possible configuration would be a DSLR camera with a fixed lens, two to three interchangeable lenses and a remote flash.
Larger DSLM cameras like the various Sony a7 series or the Fuji X-T2 still have room for more lenses.
In addition, you can store a lot of accessories.
And if you have a small DSLM camera (Olympus MFT cameras, Fujifilm X-A or E-series) you can use the rucksack for your equipment and for non-photo related things.
Drone pilots will also find the Everyday Backpack 20L a good choice, as the backpack offers enough space for a DJI Mavic Pro and accessories.
Volcanic eruption on La Palma: longest in history
In the three months since the eruption began, the lava flows on the Canary Island have caused major damage.
Is an end in sight?
With a duration of now 85 days, the volcanic eruption on La Palma has been the longest in the known history of the Spanish Canary Island since Sunday.
So far, the eruption of the Tehuya volcano in 1585, which lasted for 84 days, was the longest on the Atlantic island off the west coast of Africa.
There are no reliable data on previous eruptions.
The activity of the unnamed volcano in the Cumbre Vieja has decreased in the past few days, but volcanologists have not yet ventured a prediction as to when it might end.
The indicators point to a slowdown.
The best news is that they are stable," said the president of the island council, Mariano Hernández Zapata, to the state TV broadcaster RTVE.
Damage in millions
In the nearly three months since the eruption began, the more than 1000-degree-Fahrenheit lava has destroyed more than 2,900 homes and other buildings, RTVE reported.
About 1,200 hectares were covered by a meter-thick lava flow.
That's almost 1700 football pitches.
More than 7000 residents had to be evacuated, and the damage is estimated to be more than 900 million euros.
Two new land masses, each about 50 hectares in size, were created by cooled lava off the coast.
The island's hugely important banana industry, which employs about half of the island's 85,000 people directly or indirectly and was already in crisis before the eruption, was hit particularly hard.
225 hectares of banana plantations were destroyed, and further areas were heavily damaged, according to the newspaper "El País".
Christmas and gifts
Christmas is just around the corner and especially the children are looking forward to the heavenly festival.
The many colourful gifts under the Christmas tree are connected with the spiritual atmosphere and the crackling tension something alluring about them.
Christmas is one of the few traditional events that still bring our increasingly divided society together.
It is therefore all the more important to be aware of the Christmas tradition of giving, so that the act of giving, which according to the French sociologist and ethnologist Marcel Mauss was a peace-making "contract of nature peoples", can escape its rigid routine and be filled with life in the context of this tradition.
How Saint Nicholas became the Christ Child
Strictly speaking, it was the Protestants who linked Christmas with gift-giving.
Previously, gifts were given on St. Nicholas Day in one way or another.
The background to this still popular custom is that Saint Nicholas, as Bishop of Myra, secretly threw gold into the windows of three women to save them from a life of sin.
This unconventional way of giving birth to the popular German tradition of filling children's shoes with gifts.
Protestants objected to this practice because they reject the "holy veneration" of mediators between God and man.
For these reasons, they are wary of the institution.
Martin Luther made St. Nicholas into the Christ Child and thus established a new tradition.
The focus of the gift shifted to Christmas Eve.
However, since most Protestants no longer pay such close attention to such details, only a few are irritated that the tradition of St. Nicholas, like the tradition of St. Martin with carols and a procession, is still an integral part of the run-up to Christmas.
Today, you can find everything your heart desires, from socks to sought-after luxury watches, outside the door and under the Christmas tree.
Diversity of traditions in Christian countries
Sources indicate a tradition of gift-giving on the feast day of St. Nicholas since the 13th century.
With the Reformation, the day of giving moved to Christmas Eve.
However, in all Christian countries, there is a merry-go-round of speculation as to who will now bring the presents to the children.
In Germany, it depends on the region as to whether the Christ Child appears on Christmas Eve or the Christmas Man, who is basically a kind of Santa Claus, who has been given certain characteristics over time.
This includes, for example, his white beard, which has little in common with the rather strict Assyrian beard of the historical figure, his sledge, which is pulled by reindeer, and his preference for the fireplace, in order to gain access to the houses.
In the Netherlands, Saint Nicholas remains the central figure at Christmas.
In Spain, the Three Kings give the gifts, while in Italy it is the witch Befana who is said to have shown them the way to the baby Jesus.
In Scandinavia, sometimes mythical creatures bring the gifts, while in Russia, Father Frost brought some renown.
Here it is not horses, but three horses pulling his sleigh.
In the Czech Republic, the birthplace of the Reformation during the Hussite Wars, the Christ Child is responsible for handing out the gifts.
I have been getting this error for 3 weeks when trying to download a new book, but my account and contact details are up to date:
Please help with the error correction, as I
Otherwise, you can buy another e-book #PRS_ORG#.
I have been trying to get a return label for my order #NUMBER# last week and this morning.
I was told that one would be sent to me.
Since I haven't received any (not even in the spam folder), I wanted to ask how long this usually takes.
Many thanks.
Police shoot suspected bank robber near the Royal Palace
A man armed with a knife was shot by police near Kensington Palace in London on Saturday.
Police said callers reported a man with a gun going into a bank and a bookmaker's shop.
The man fled in a vehicle that was later stopped by officers, authorities said.
Shots were fired and the man was hit.
He was pronounced dead at the scene.
The police did not assume a terrorist background.
Several embassies are located in the area around Kensington Palace.
The palace is the official London residence of Prince William, his wife Catherine and their three children.
Other members of the royal family also live there.
What are they?
No matter where I click, I am immediately redirected to your side.
The decorative light fits harmoniously into every garden, garden area or rock garden.
The light is simply set up and can be anchored into the ground with two earth spikes.
Integrated and powerful 0.4 Watt solar module for optimal charging of the built-in battery.
Maximum light duration of up to 10 hours.
The robust plastic design is suitable for use outdoors all year round.
In the Hollywood spectacle, it is usually threatening objects from distant galaxies that glow internally in colour.
Smart Stone, on the other hand, is completely harmless: The sun alone ensures that this solar lamp shines fascinatingly – either in white or in coloured light (in six different colour tones).
The seamless, amorphous design is deliberately chosen: like a natural-formed large pebble, this modern light object presents itself during the day.
Its organic curves fit into any natural environment - whether on the edge of a terrace, in the lawn or in the rock garden.
He also does well in the company of larger pebbles and stones, where he can hold his own thanks to his size.
You can save a lot of work: "Smart Stone" does not require an electrical connection or batteries - it is a solar light.
Set the "beacon" in a sunny spot at any time of the day.
Two earth spikes are supplied to provide a secure fix as required.
The matt-white plastic housing itself is robust and weatherproof.
Its solar panel hides "Smart Stone" discreetly inside, together with its battery and two LEDs - one for white, the other for coloured light.
The battery is already charging when sunlight falls on the house.
When the sun goes down, "Smart Stone" begins to glow automatically; you choose the colour yourself: there are a total of six attractive light colours to choose from, in addition to daylight white.
The shutdown is also automatic, once the battery charge level has fallen below a predetermined minimum or it becomes bright again.
Once the sun comes out, the charging cycle starts again the next day.
I have done this several times and it doesn't work.
Shame, I would have liked to have continued shopping with you, but if the voucher doesn't get credited, then I won't be ordering out of principle.
If you change your mind then let me know.
Otherwise, that was the last contact.
Then please send me the number for the sideboard.
In the lockdown, no garden centre has opened....
The motor control system of the LokSound 5 has been completely revised.
A variable PWM frequency of 10kHz to 50kHz ensures particularly quiet operation for bell anchor motors – the typical "buzzing" is a thing of the past.
The load regulation can now also be adjusted to suit difficult cases up to 10 CVs.
The unique "Auto-tune" function allows the decoder to automatically tune to the motor.
The LokSound 5 decoder provides up to 1.5A motor current, which is enough for older motors.
- Please use the eBay shopping cart so that shipping costs are calculated correctly.
- You will receive an email with the tracking number.
- They receive an invoice from the specialist retailer for every new product purchased.
- We usually process your order or enquiry within 24 hours of receipt, Monday to Friday.
Pill problem
Hello dear people of the world,
I hope I'm doing this right, it's my first post on reddit after a year.
My problem: I started taking the pill about five years ago, mainly because I was having such horrendous pain during my period and awful PMS leading up to it.
Now I would like to leave it at that, because I already have to take enough medication for chronic illnesses that I can't choose.
My main problem, surprisingly not the pain, but my skin.
I had a massive breakout of pimples from 0 to 100 in my last roughly two-year break and they were everywhere.
That's as superficial as it gets, but it really bothered me and I didn't feel good about it.
In the two years off, nothing has really normalised.
Maybe someone has some tips on how to avoid this this time.
My cosmetics are already fragrance-free and unscented, but maybe there's something someone can recommend to me.
The gynaecologist didn't take me seriously and the dermatologist's appointment is still to come.
Many thanks to everyone who has read the book!
Yes, the love of skin is a thing.
Had severe neurodermatitis, then a period of rest, then large-scale lichen planus and the acne issue.
I've also tried everything in terms of diet, and have ended up on a mixed diet of sugar, milk and meat, because nothing else has worked properly.
It can also be good that the hormone is simply inside the worm, but if you want to have building sites everywhere, you'd better not look for anything else that might go wrong.
I had already done everything their colleague had done.
Written and now I've lost the conversation and don't know what was said in response to my query.
I have to work in between and suddenly everything was gone...
What is there to check when the money is there, I would have seen it
Please check my bank details, maybe there was something wrong
But it is generally available in large quantities
as it is available in black
The Zappiti 4K HDR series - the best movie experience ever!
Zappiti designs and produces high-end video management systems; for the best picture quality, outstanding performance and maximum user-friendliness.
All Zappiti products are designed to give you a convenient and intuitive way to access your entire film library in stunning 4K High Definition.
The award-winning Zappiti Player is successfully used around the world to improve the movie experience, both at home and in commercial environments.
The Zappiti Neo supports most digital audio and video formats, including the latest 4K HDR standards such as Dolby Vision and HDR10+, almost all current video formats, complete BD/UHD menus, HEVC video codec with a billion colors (10-bit color coding), VP-9, 3D video standards with 3D subtitles, high-resolution audio formats such as DSD, FLAC, ALAC and MQA, and has a wide, solid enclosure, two HDMI outputs, 4K 60p, Dolby Atmos and DTS:X for the best possible home cinema experience.
The combination of Zappiti Magic Pixel V3 and VS10 video processing offers outstanding picture quality - far better than previous generations - with improved dynamics, more precise colour representation, increased contrast, solid de-interlacing and better upscaling (up to 4K resolution).
Even on a Full HD 1080p TV or a front projector, you'll be blown away by the quality of your display!
3D also offers a better depth of field and an impressive, immersive effect.
Some Android apps are not suitable for use with the remote.
In this case, use a connected computer mouse or an AirMouse (not included in the delivery).
Network replay: Special network optimisation, thanks to SMB protocol (including HEVC UHD files) guarantees better playback performance over the local network, independent of the type of media.
Universal RC: Seamless integration in smart home installations using ready-to-use Control4 drivers, RTI drivers, Elan drivers, Crestron IP codes, Savant, ProControl, Logitech, URC, Pronto and general IP codes.
It doesn't help much as I've been waiting for it since September.
Now nothing works anymore.
My account is apparently locked and the language is English
Also compatible with all printers that according to the manufacturer's or user's instructions use the products listed above.
Over 10 years of experience as a specialist dealer in toner production
All trade names and brand names referred to, as well as all model designations referred to, are the property of the respective legitimate manufacturers and owners.
Their mention is merely for the purpose of orientation and awareness of the compatibility of the goods.
They are not original products of the respective printer manufacturers, but compatible goods.
Which vouchers?
I didn't get my voucher for my last order!
In the name of the people: laypeople pass judgement
They sit in the courtroom in their everyday clothes.
But their verdict is crucial, even if they don't wear robes: judges decide whether and for how long someone goes to jail.
Two of them report to the "Public" about their time at the Bad Kreuznach District Court: Sascha Wickert from Boos and Ruth Ertz from Bad Kreuznach are two of the 125 lay judges at the District Court on John F. Kennedy Street.
Hello, unfortunately I cannot access the customer account.
Could you please send me the invoice for order #NUMBER# to the email address above again?
Can we dispose of the packaging material?
We don't have the means to preserve them for that length of time.
We would use the table as they offered it, as if it were ours.
I had already ordered the same seat in blue in November and received it. Therefore, because they are so nice, I now have one in grey.
Does the cabinet need to be completely dismantled for collection and return?
And when would collection be?
110 kV underground cables will be built in 2022
The approval for the laying of the new high-voltage cable in Tann is legally binding.
The government of Lower Bavaria's planning approval decision clears the way for construction to begin in 2022.
Now the network operator Bayernwerk has announced this.
The seven-kilometre-long underground cable will connect the Tann substation in the north of the municipality and the existing 110-kilovolt line between Simbach and Pfarrkirchen.
The cable is connected to a mast near the village of Edermanning in Reut.
Good morning
My order from 03.01.21 with the order number #NUMBER# has only arrived in parts to us so far.
The blue Betsell number #PRS_ORG# with the transmission number #NUMBER# was sent back by #PRS_ORG# with the remark "Delivery not possible".
All three packages have arrived, so delivery is definitely possible.
Can you tell me what the next steps are?
Have a nice start to the week!
You can forget that, I have already explained this several times yesterday!
It's a glass wardrobe and all the sides are smashed, so there's glass everywhere and the box is broken
The wardrobe is in my flat and #PRS_ORG# refuses to come into the flat because of the #PRS_ORG# rules
This means that the wardrobe cannot be removed because no one is allowed to enter my apartment
Thanks for the message
But why only 20 euros?
The original value of this chair was #NUMBER# EUR
No, it's the same for all books, so yes, the request was made to #PRS_ORG# as it's likely to be a general problem
Ref: Lesson planning (EK)
Hello dear colleagues and colleagues,
I have been in the RE since the summer and teaching is fun, but at the moment I have big problems planning my geography lessons efficiently.
Unfortunately, my school is not well equipped with technology, so I can only use the blackboard, the school book and an overhead projector as a medium.
At school, I can only copy for free (which is annoying for geography).
I currently need a very long time to plan my hours.
For example, we are currently dealing with the topic of geofactors, and at the moment, every hour is different for me.
In principle, the methods are always the same, but on the other hand, I don't want to invest too much time in simple lessons (I need that time for UBs etc.).
I usually plan based on the learning objectives (what I want to achieve) and then think about how I can build on that (I usually make a worksheet with texts from books that my school doesn't have).
We have the book Terra and with most of the tasks in the book I am rather dissatisfied.
That is why the worksheets as well.
Maybe a geography teacher could show me how to work efficiently with the book.
I would really be happy about that.
I would like to return the #PRS_ORG# from order #NUMBER#
I have actually already decided on a new one with #PRS_ORG#, but I would like to return it as soon as possible.
The trade is worried about the 2G rule for Christmas.
Only those who have been vaccinated or recovered are allowed to enter most stores.
The trade considers this to be unnecessary and complains of a drop in sales.
He also has a possible solution.
The 2G rules are damaging the Christmas trade for the German retail trade association (HDE), according to the HDE.
Sales drops for non-essential items are regrettable, said HDE managing director Stefan Genth.
According to a recent survey by the HDE, more than 70 percent of companies are looking negatively on the remaining days of the year.
Many had already written off Christmas business.
"What should have been the high point of the year is now often a bottomless pit," said Genth.
Dealers with 2G access restrictions are said to have lost a third of their pre-crisis turnover in the past week.
It's only going well in the food retail sector and online.
The association demanded consequences from the dramatic development.
Shopping with masks, distance and hygiene concept is a safe affair, said the managing director.
"Buying 2G does not help us in the fight against the pandemic," he stressed.
The current regulations are scaring customers away and requiring high staffing levels.
He demanded that the band aid regulation be approved nationwide.
After that, each customer will only need to be checked once for 2G (vaccinated or recovered) and will have access to all shops with the band they received that day.
In the retail sector - as is already the case in public transport with the 3G rule (vaccinated, recovered or tested) - sample controls should suffice.
The property group Deutsche Euroshop, which specialises in shopping centres, also spoke of a difficult Christmas.
The frequencies were last without 2G at around 75 percent of the pre-Corona level, the turnover at around 90 percent.
These figures will fall right in the middle of the so-important Christmas trade," said CEO Wilhelm Wellner to the "Wirtschaftswoche".
Due to the high personnel and administrative costs, attempts are being made to find solutions and have them approved for the centres.
This includes the so-called wristband solution, where "visitors, for example, can prove their 2G status at a central point in the centre once and then, equipped with an armband similar to that of a club hotel, can enter all the shops without being disturbed". dpa
I recently ordered and received the #PRS_ORG#
The Spiegel has a scratch and there is also a flaw on the frame, which was attempted to be covered up with a yellow filler.
That looks bad.
I would like to return the mirror and have already packed it back in the box and taped it back up.
How should I proceed with the return now?
The lamp is designed for dual-balance, based on new, flat SMD LEDs with high power and high colour rendering.
A modern microprocessor with exceptional capabilities is used to set the colour temperature and brightness of the lamp.
In addition to adjusting the brightness, there are two standard colour temperatures: daylight and artificial light.
It is also possible to set the color temperature in the range of 3100 - 5650K manually and save it.
Take advantage of the current settings in the flash memory.
A special feature of the controller is that it is simple and intuitive to use.
The light produces a very high light output with soft, high-quality light, completely flicker-free.
The 120-degree beam angle allows you to illuminate large areas at relatively close distances, which is great.
By the way, also in reporter situations in small rooms or short distances.
They can practically adjust the brightness without changing the colour temperature.
It's a great tool to work with on set or in the studio.
The optional DMX512 controller allows remote control of the light in television studios or when the light is mounted in hard-to-reach places.
On the back of the light is the control panel, consisting of buttons and a glowing display.
The display shows the current brightness setting in percent and the current colour temperature in Kelvin.
There is also a slot for NP-F batteries (not included in the delivery)
Users can store up to three panel settings for brightness and colour temperature.
To access the individual settings on the storage locations, simply hold down one of the storage keys for longer and it's done.
The storage controller saves the current state of the lamp when it is switched off, so that when it is switched on again the known situation is restored - very useful when working in the studio, for example, when the camera is set to a specific colour temperature.
Working with batteries is one of the greatest strengths of the DL3120 functionality, as it allows you to use inexpensive NP-F batteries.
These are often already in the possession of photographers and cameramen (and women) - so you can make use of existing equipment.
The DL3120 can also check before setting whether the batteries have enough power - it has a built-in battery tester - for each of the two battery compartments, a value is displayed in the two display windows (the left battery upper display, the right battery lower display).
In addition, it is of course possible to supply the headlights continuously with power via the supplied power supply unit.
The construction of the Scheinwerfer is very simple.
They have a 16mm thread as a mount so you can connect directly to your tripod.
The inclination is set reliably on both sides by means of a sensor.
It was noted that the mechanical components are also of the highest quality and are therefore designed for longevity and hard use.
In addition, a swivel joint is included in the delivery.
The bag is also included in the delivery.
This way you can transport or store the light with all the accessories you might want to buy without any problems.
A shame, I got it as a gift and it's too small :(
"Party we wanted to throw": Frankfurt celebrates after comeback against Leverkusen
What a spectacular reaction from Eintracht Frankfurt.
After 22 minutes, the Hesse team, who had lost their last two games in a row, appeared to be on their way to their next Bundesliga defeat.
But then the SGE turned it around, within a good hour they banished the frustration of a mixed start to the season by winning 5:2. "It's crazy what the lads have done today," jubilant coach Oliver Glasner said on DAZN, and he gave "special praise to everyone who was there."
At first it looked like another disappointment for the now ninth-placed Frankfurt team, who are still not meeting expectations.
Patrik Schick had put Leverkusen 2-0 ahead.
What then happened was also impressive to the SGE coach.
"How the players have come back and shown a fantastic performance," continued Glasner.
I'm absolutely delighted with the performance we've shown and of course with the result.
Even defender Christopher Lenz, who was able to return to the field for the first time since the fourth game day and his muscle injury, emphasised the morale of his team-mates.
"I think our mentality is incredible," said the 27-year-old, and he was pleased with the result in particular for the spectators.
That was the party we wanted to throw today.
However, Glasner wants to keep the focus on the upcoming tasks, but he is also well-prepared in terms of his personal situation.
It's remarkable that we have all our players fit in December, that all our players are in top shape.
It's top-class work in our medical department, but the players also live a highly professional life.
Now they want to "move forward step by step and remain modest" and "complete the tasks until the end of the year at this level."
Next up is an away game against Borussia Mönchengladbach (7.30pm, Sky) on Wednesday as part of the English week.
I will get the mail that my package is being returned to you due to an error on my part.
I tried calling #PRS_ORG# and got nowhere.
Can it be sent directly to me again or do I have to wait until the money is returned and the order is cancelled again?
For me, unfortunately, it would mean that I would not order again because it has already taken too long.
Have they ever sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
Handball women's dampers ahead of quarter-final against Spain
Germany's handball women slumped after the humiliation against Denmark with their heads down and their eyes empty.
At the end of the main round of the World Championships, the DHB selection suffered a bitter defeat of 16:32 (8:13) in front of 800 spectators in Granollers and must now face the host Spain in the quarter-finals.
"We were too afraid and had too much respect for the opponent," national coach Henk Groener concluded.
We have to play differently against Spain.
After the first defeat in the tournament, Germany finished the main round group III with 8:2 points, behind the Danes (10:0).
It's a shame we couldn't take the flow with us.
That was a bad game we have to forget," captain Emily Bölk said.
In the battle to reach the semi-finals, a significant step up is required against the 2019 World Championships silver medallist on Tuesday to keep alive the fragile dream of a first medal since 2007.
The best German thrower in the duel with the three-time Olympic champion Denmark was the right-back Alina Grijseels with six goals.
"We weren't there - neither in attack, nor in defence," conceded back-up defender Xenia Smits, and demanded: "We must now look ahead quickly."
Not level from front to back
Unlike in the previous five matches, the German team was not on the same level at the start.
Missed shots and technical errors in the attack and gaps in the defence were responsible for a quick 0:4 lead after seven minutes.
Only goalkeeper Dinah Eckerle was immediately on top form and prevented worse with some saves.
The first goal for the DHB team came after 9:30 minutes, when Grijseels successfully completed a quick counter-attack.
However, the hoped-for ignition was not.
Against the aggressive coverage of the Danes, the German women could hardly get into the game - and when they did, they usually failed due to the strong Althea Reinhardt in the Skandinavians' goal.
So the game ended prematurely after 20 minutes with a score of 3:10, as defender Mia Zschocke saw red just a few minutes later for a hard foul on her opponent.
However, she is allowed to take part in the quarter finals.
It was only in the final phase of the first half that the DHB selection played a little better and at least reached five goals by the break.
The only faint hope of a comeback after the change was gone after seven minutes, when the score was 9:19.
The Green-Schützlings once again failed in all areas and made it easy for their well-prepared opponents, who are among the medal contenders at the end of the tournament.
As a result, the German team could no longer rise to the challenge and went as a clear loser from the parkett.
DACH Advent Calendar Day 6: Family traditions in the Christmas season
As part of the Reddit Advent Calendar, we have celebrated Christmas Day and are taking this as an opportunity to dedicate ourselves to family traditions in the run-up to Christmas, Advent, St. Nicholas Day, Christmas Eve and Christmas Day.
How was it at home back then?
Like your partner?
Do you want to pass on your traditions to your children?
What is best for the children?
The boot cleaning?
Baking cookies?
Decorating a tree?
Will it be played?
Is Santa Claus, the Christ Child or is the gift from Oma and Opa?
No matter how you do it, everyone gives themselves a hard time around Christmas to make it as nice as possible as a family.
Whether they are firmly established traditions, or even something different every year: tell us how it went, or is going, in your family!
Please send me any transaction number or anything that might help
Confirmation of transfer... etc
I would like to give a voucher code
as is the case with #PRS_ORG# gift vouchers
Does that work for them?
The title suggests that I work in mobile vaccination teams, where (so far) only the BioNTech/Pfizer vaccine is given in care homes.
As these are soon to be completed, it then goes on to vaccine centres for me.
I am happy to answer questions on the organisational and human aspects, as well as medical questions, provided that they are not personal (e.g. "I take medication X, is this compatible with the vaccine...").
In my area of responsibility, I am responsible for the vaccination, the indication (the person is entitled to a vaccination under the Corona vaccination ordinance and has no reasons against it), the medical documentation and, if necessary, the emergency treatment for allergic reactions (which has never happened to me).
The vaccination itself can be delegated to qualified personnel, e.g. medical staff.
In the vaccination teams, we often don't have any of them, but "only" (for God's sake, no lack of appreciation!) pharmaceutical technicians for the preparation of the vaccine, who cannot (are not allowed to) carry out vaccinations, so that I carry out most of the vaccinations myself.
Serious "Huidlerer" question: Amberger knows the solution
What is a "Huidlerer"?
With this dialect word, sent in by an Amberger, the BR television programme "Wir in Bayern" has caused a lot of heated debate.
However, unlike on many previous days, the term "Host mi?" remained unheard by the callers this time.
No, it wasn't "a man who is nervous."
And no one, "who has to do everything quickly".
That was what the people heard from the TV presenter, that was completely wrong.
The man from Amberg communicated the solution and thus probably caused surprise among many Upper Palatines.
"The Huidlerer," the audience learned, "is a cloth used to clean the oven."
Linguist Antony Rowley, who has been interviewed by Bayerischer Fernsehen for years as an expert, confirmed this.
With the note that this is a typical Upper Palatinate term, derived in some way from the more well-known dialect word "Houdern".
With which a gap in education was closed - perhaps also for many who have already been living in the Amberg area for a long time.
I haven't been able to buy books for two weeks.
After confirmation, the following error message always follows: oops - something went wrong - try again later.
I have restarted the #PRS_ORG#, connected it to the PC, synchronized and repaired it.
Nothing has helped.
Choosing tyres for a racing bike - really so safe?
Today, this morning, I woke up full of the urge to train, because I wanted to at least do a little training before my bike tour next week.
Said, done and I rode my racing bike, which I bought yesterday on eBay.
The first 40km were also really nice - but then it happened, what awaits you in every city (this time: thanks, Krefeld!).
Glass splinters on the track.
Zack, loud snoring and my back tyre meant that the rest of the journey was out of the question.
As I didn't have any real chance of getting a replacement jacket and wetsuit on a weekday, I had to turn back and take the first bus home in a somewhat bad mood.
It wasn't quite as bad as it could have been, maybe it's better if I practice changing the tyre before the bike tour.
But now I'm facing a question and I hope you can help me.
As I have a relatively long distance to cover over several days, I would really rather not get this problem often.
It wasn't really bad now, as the old tyres from the previous owner (a very nice old man who had ridden 140km the day before I collected the bike) were also sub-optimal, as he had ridden on them for many years.
But if I think that I have to change a tyre when driving at 80-90 km/h, then I am really in a bad mood:D
Now I'm chatting to an older man on the platform who is bemused as to why I don't have the Marathon Plus tyres; they're supposed to be puncture-proof.
Now, the whole thing sounds very tempting.
But are they really so unbreakable?
I have little desire to spend €40/tyre now, only to be disappointed in the end.
I also ask myself: I think I weigh 25x622 on my racing bike at the moment.
They do exist (apparently?) on the Marathon Plus tyres, but the majority are already wider.
Is this a problem?
Or would you advise me to change tyres on a racing bike in general?
The Schwalbe side seems to be my absolute! I would rather recommend the Durano DD?
Thanks in advance for the help and best wishes!
Car hits tree: driver killed
The 53-year-old was driving his car on the B57 between Rheinberg and Xanten for unknown reasons when it crashed into a central island and then went onto the wrong side of the road, the police said.
There, a head-on collision occurred with the vehicle of a 27-year-old.
The 53-year-old's car was then driven into a tree and the man trapped inside.
The 27-year-old and his 23-year-old co-driver were seriously injured in the accident and taken to nearby hospitals.
Yes we have all books deleted, everything authorized and new books loaded
Environmentally friendly: The products of MOTIP DUPLI are free of health-damaging metals.
The company is committed to using formulations without regulated or questionable ingredients without compromising the best possible performance.
The caps and packaging are made from recyclable materials.
Disposal: Please only place empty containers in the recycling bin.
Containers with residue to be taken to the problem disposal site.
Indication: All products of MOTIP DUPLI comply with the respective current labelling regulations.
The classification, categorization, and labelling are carried out in accordance with GHS/CLP 1272/2008/EG in its current form.
The safety data sheets comply with REACH 1907/2006/EC, Article 31 and Annex II, in the current version.
Many DUPLI-COLOR spray paints prevent unauthorised use by means of spray safety and tamper-proof closure caps.
Pay attention to the relevant notes on the cap or label.
Before use, always carefully read and observe the warning texts!
Will I get confirmation by email for this?
I have already been assured of this by your colleagues 3 times...how reliable is your information?
When will the freight company contact me?
I have already written, have you not received my sms?
Following the publication of our new high-end stereo B 100-6 OHM, it was only a matter of time before our SOLO series would once again have new offspring.
SOLO 15 is the new Sprössling and is reminiscent of the big models with the B 200 - 6 OHM.
However, this design proposal includes a suitable designed-in foot to raise the speaker to the correct listening position.
This has no effect on acoustics and can therefore be adjusted accordingly to suit the circumstances at home.
In principle, the SOLO 15 is very suitable for people for whom the maximum volume is of less importance, but who want to achieve an exceptionally high sound level.
A 10 cm speaker simply cannot produce such high sound pressure levels without filtering.
However, this does not mean that SOLO 15 sounds weak.
On the contrary, it is impressively mature for its size.
The SOLO 15 was tuned to a slight up-tone.
This is common practice for wideband systems to optimise the strong increase in the high frequencies.
The SOLO 15 is exactly aimed at the listening place and convinces with a very clear and fine sound.
The high-frequency range can be reduced slightly and thus the sound image made warmer.
Thanks to the point source, the individual components of a piece of music can be located with pinpoint accuracy in the optimal stereo triangle.
The reference-suspicious extremely low mechanical losses of the B 100 - 6 OHM generate an enemy dynamic that is similar to its own.
The SOLO 15 not only complements our SOLO series, but also extends it in terms of resolution and accuracy.
As with all our construction projects, it is advisable to think about the final appearance of the speaker at the outset, so that appropriate changes to the construction can be planned.
If, for example, the housing is to be veneered, the speaker must be adjusted accordingly, as the veneer adds additional material.
Once all the records have been cut (e.g. at a DIY store), the first step should be to drill a 8mm hole in the floorboard at the corresponding place, so that the cable can be passed through without any problems later on.
With the help of a surface grinder, the speaker opening in the front is now created, so that the B 100 - 6 OHM can be fitted flush later.
The opening should be provided with a 45° chamfer to maximize the opening area of the speaker chassis inside.
The four connection points of the B 100 - 6 OHM get a phase interruption, as shown in the "Phase Detail" image.
After that, one starts with the actual construction of the box and places one of the side walls on a flat surface in front of oneself.
These are now glued to the back, the lid, the front and the floor.
The three stiffenings should also be fitted and glued in place.
The stiffeners themselves can vary in thickness depending on whether you want to use ready-made boards from the DIY store or make your own from 16mm MDF.
In the next step, the second side is applied.
Then follow all the records of the feet, i.e. the two sides and the front.
With the help of a suitable hole saw or Forstner drill, the installation of the openings of the bass reflex resonator, as well as the connection clamp on the back wall, is facilitated.
Afterwards, a round-over cutter is used to round off all the edges of the actual box.
The top of the footboard can also be rounded off.
The base plate is then firmly glued to the bottom of the housing and additionally screwed with long wood screws.
This is followed by marking and drilling (2.5mm drill bit) the screw-in points of the speaker chassis and the connection plug.
After the housing has been cleaned of wood dust (vacuum / blow), the cable is laid.
The easiest way to do this is through the 35 mm bass reflex opening in the back wall.
Here, the entire and uncut cable is pushed through the 8 mm hole in the foot piece by piece until the terminal opening, where it is left to protrude by about 30 cm.
In the upper part of the housing, the cable is led to the speaker opening and is also left hanging loosely there.
The frequency selector is prepared and used.
The construction plan for the frequency switch, as well as the corresponding connection plan, can be found in the following document: Installation instructions Weiche Solo 15.
If the frequency switch is installed and the connection terminal is tightened, the sealing of the 8 mm cable opening inside the box, which is not yet completely closed, follows.
With the 35mm bASSREFLEX aperture and a little skill, you can drip hot glue onto the aperture and seal it.
By opening the B 100 - 6 OHM and using a small lamp, the seal can be checked accordingly.
Now comes the punishment, according to the description.
Then the B 100 - 6 OHM is connected and fixed with the corresponding screws.
The polarity plays an important role here, so that the positive lead (marked cable) must be soldered to the positive speaker terminal (larger contact).
Finally, the bass reflex tube is cut to the given length of 28 mm (total length of the tube) and inserted.
To dampen it, a mat of the damping material is cut into two parts and loosely distributed in the housing.
The opening around the bass reflex channel should be preserved.
Can I cancel my order now and have it delivered only in early June?
> Hallo an alle,
> Finally, we can announce that we will once again be hosting OSCAST this year!
Unfortunately, due to known reasons, we are unfortunately not able to get more than four people into the studio, which means a higher planning effort and explains the short notice of the announcement.
BUT: There will be at least three people on shift, so we'll be streaming the Oscars 2021 with at least seven beans and hopefully thousands of you!
We do our best to avoid delays or other problems.
But hey, it's still a pandemic - so we're going to do everything we can to make the Oscars as entertaining as possible.
It will start around 0:30.
Get some drinks, plan a good meal, and get ready for a long, but very interesting night.
